Missouri, session 2026, SB973.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 140.010, 140.190, 140.250, 140.420,
2
140.980, 140.981, 140.982, 140.983, 140.984, 140.985, 140.986,
3
140.987, 140.988, 140.991, 140.994, 140.995, 140.1000,
4
140.1009, 140.1012, 141.220, 141.230, 141.250, 141.270,
5
141.290, 141.300, 141.320, 141.330, 141.360, 141.410, 141.440,
6
141.500, 141.520, 141.535, 141.540, 141.550, 141.560, 141.570,
7
141.580, 141.610, 141.620, 141.680, 141.700, 141.819, 141.980,
8
141.984, 141.1009, 141.1020, and 249.255, RSMo, are repealed
9
and fifty-one new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known
10
as sections 140.010, 140.190, 140.250, 140.420, 140.980,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 2
11
140.981, 140.982, 140.983, 140.984, 140.985, 140.986, 140.987,
12
140.988, 140.991, 140.994, 140.995, 140.1000, 140.1009,
13
140.1012, 141.220, 141.230, 141.250, 141.270, 141.290, 141.300,
14
141.320, 141.330, 141.360, 141.410, 141.440, 141.500, 141.520,
15
141.535, 141.540, 141.550, 141.560, 141.570, 141.580, 141.610,
16
141.620, 141.680, 141.700, 141.819, 141.980, 141.984, 141.1009,
17
141.1020, 249.255, 407.3600, 442.920, and 1, to read as follows:
1
140.010. 1. All real estate upon which the taxes
2
remain unpaid on t he first day of January, annually, are
3
delinquent, and the county collector shall enforce the lien
4
of the state thereon, as required by this chapter. Any
5
failure to properly return the delinquent list, as required
6
by this chapter, in no way affects the validity of the
7
assessment and levy of taxes, nor of the foreclosure and
8
sale by which the collection of the taxes is enforced, nor
9
in any manner affects the lien of the state on the
10
delinquent real estate for the taxes unpaid thereon.
11
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a
12
resolut i on or order of the county commission of such county,
13
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
14
141.810 for any parcel [for which there is an unpaid tax
15
bill for a period of at least two years after the date on
16
which it became delinquent]. Any county electing to operate
17
as such shall be called a "p a rtial opt-in county". No
18
county eligible to establish a land bank agency un d er
19
subsection 1 of section 140.981 shall elect to operate as a
20
partial opt-in county unless the county first elects to
21
establish a land bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of
22
section 140.981. In accordance with section 141.290, after
23
the adoption of s uch resolution or order by a county
24
commission, the collector of the county shall decide which
25
tax delinquent parcels shall proceed according to the

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 3
26
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810. Such parcels
27
shall be exempt from the provisions of sec t ions 140.030 to
28
140.722. The collector shall remove such parcels from any
29
list of p arcels advertised for first, second, third, or post-
30
third sales.
1
140.190. 1. On the day mentioned in the notice, the
2
county collec t or s hall commence the sale of such lands, and
3
shall continue the same from day to day until each parcel
4
assessed or belonging to each person assessed shall be sold
5
as will pay the taxes, interest, and charges thereon, or
6
chargeable to such person in said county.
7
2. (1) The person or land bank agency offering at
8
said sa l e to pay the required sum for a tract shall be
9
considered the purchaser of such land; provided, no sale
10
shall be made to any person or designated agent who:
11
(a) Is currently delinquent on any tax payments on any
12
property , other than a delinquency on the property being
13
offered for sale, and who does not sign an affidavit stating
14
such at the time of sale. Failure to sign such affidavit as
15
well as signing a false af fidavit may invalidate such sale;
16
(b) Is a member of the governing body of a land bank
17
agency;
18
(c) Is an employee of a land bank agency;
19
(d) Is an elected or appointed official of the
20
governin g body, or an employee of such official, of the
21
political subdivision in which a land bank agency is
22
located; or
23
(e) Is related within the second degree of
24
consangu i nity to a person described in paragraphs (b) to (d)
25
of this subdivision.
26
(2) No bid shall be received from any person not a
27
resident of the state of Missouri or a foreign corporation

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 4
28
or entity all deemed nonresidents. A nonresident shall file
29
with said collector an agreement in writing consenting to
30
the jurisdiction of the circuit court of the county in which
31
such sale shall be made, and also filing with such collector
32
an appointment of some citizen of said county as agent of
33
said nonresident, and consenting that service of process on
34
such agent shall give such court jurisdiction to try and
35
determine any suit growing out of or connected with such
36
sale for taxes. After the delinquent auction sale, any
37
certificate of p urchase shall be issued to the agent. After
38
meeting the requirements of section 140.405, the prop e rty
39
shall be conveyed to the agent on behalf of the nonresident,
40
and the agent shall thereafter convey the property to the
41
nonresident. A collector may preclude a prospective bidder
42
from partici p ating in a sale for failure to comply with any
43
of the provisions of this section.
44
3. All such written consents to jurisdiction and
45
selecti v e appointments shall be preserved by the county
46
collector and shall be binding upon any person or
47
corporation claiming under the person consenting to
48
jurisdiction and making the appointment herein referred to;
49
provided further, that in the event of the death, disability
50
or refusal to act of the person appointed as agent of said
51
nonresident the county clerk shall become the appointee as
52
agent of said nonresident.
53
4. No person residing in any home rule city with more
54
than se v enty-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine
55
thousand inhabitants shall be eligible to offer to purchase
56
lands under this section unless such person has, no later
57
than ten days before the sale date, demonstrated to the
58
satisfaction of the official charged by law with conducting
59
the sale that the person is not the owner of any parcel of

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 5
60
real property that has two or more violations of the
61
municipality's building or housing codes. A prospective
62
bidder may make such a demonstration by p r esenting
63
statements from the appropriate collection and code
64
enforcement officials of the municipality. This subsection
65
shall not apply to any taxing authority or land bank agency,
66
and entities shall be eligible to bid at any sale conducted
67
under this section without making such a demonstration.
1
140.250. 1. Whenever any lands have been or shall
2
hereafter be o ffe r ed for sale for delinquent taxes,
3
interest, penalty, and costs by the collector of the proper
4
county for any two successive years and no person shall have
5
bid therefor a sum equal to the delinquent taxes thereon,
6
interest, penalty and costs provided by law, then such
7
county collector shall at the next regular tax sale of lands
8
for delinquent taxes sell same to the highest bidder, except
9
the highest bid shall not be less than the sum equal to the
10
delinquent taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, and there
11
shall be a ninety-day period of redemption from such sales
12
as specified in section 140.405.
13
2. A certificate of purchase shall be issued as to
14
such sa l es, and the purchaser at such sales shall be
15
entitled to the issuance and delivery of a collector's deed
16
upon completion of title search action as specified in
17
section 140.405.
18
3. If any lands or lots are not sold at such third
19
offerin g , then the collector shall advertise or offer such
20
lands or lots for sale once every thirty days.
21
4. A purchaser at any sale subsequent to the third
22
offerin g of any land or lots, whether by the collector or a
23
trustee as provided in section 140.260, shall be entitled to
24
the immediate issuance and delivery of a collector's deed

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 6
25
and there shall be no period of redemption from such post-
26
third year sales; provided, however, before any purchaser at
27
a sale to which this section is applicable shall be entitled
28
to a collector's deed it shall be the duty of the collector
29
to demand, and the purchaser to pay, in addition to the
30
purchaser's bid, all taxes due and unpaid on such lands or
31
lots that become due and payable on such lands or lots
32
subsequent to the date of the taxes included in such
33
advertisement and sale. The collector's deed or trustee's
34
deed shall have priorit y over all other liens or
35
encumbrances on the property sold except for real property
36
taxes.
37
5. A purchaser at any sale subsequent to the third
38
offerin g of any land or lots, whether by the collector or a
39
trustee as provided in section 140.260, may elect to proceed
40
under subsection 1 of this section and subsection 6 of
41
section 140.405 by giving notice to the collector prior to
42
the issuance of a collector's deed.
43
6. In the event the real purchaser at any sale to
44
which t h is section is applicable shall be the owner of the
45
lands or lots purchased, or shall be obligated to pay the
46
taxes for the nonpayment of which such lands or lots were
47
sold, then no collector's deed shall be issued to such
48
purchaser, or to anyone acting for or on behalf of such
49
purchaser, without payment to the collector of such
50
additional amount as will discharge in full all delinquent
51
taxes, penalty, interest and costs.
1
140.420. If no person shall redeem the lands sold for
2
taxes prior t o the expiration of the right to redeem, at the
3
expiration thereof, and on production of the certificate of
4
purchase and upon proof satisfactory to the collector that a

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 7
5
purchaser or the purchaser's heirs, successors, or assigns
6
are authorized to acquire the deed:
7
(1) The collector of the county in which the sale of
8
such lan d s took place shall execute to the purchaser or the
9
purchaser's heirs or assigns, in the name of the state, a
10
conveyance of the real estate so sold, which shall vest in
11
the grantee an absolute estate in fee simple, subject,
12
however, to all claims thereon for unpaid taxes except such
13
unpaid taxes, existing at time of the purchase of said lands
14
and the lien for which taxes was inferior to the lien for
15
taxes for which said tract or lot of land was sold; and
16
(2) The state of Missouri or any person, taxing
17
authorit y , tax district, judgment creditor, or lienholder
18
that had a right, title, interest, claim, or equity of
19
redemption on or to the lands or that had a lien upon the
20
lands shall be barred and forever foreclosed of such
21
unclaimed right, title, interest, claim, or equity of
22
redemption in or to the lands and of any lien upon the lands.
1
140.980. 1. Sections 140.980 to 140.1015 shall be
2
known [and ma y be cited] as the "Chapter 140 Land Bank Act".
3
2. As used in sections 140.980 to 140.1015, the
4
followi n g terms mean:
5
(1) "Land bank agency", an agency established by a
6
county o r municipality under the authority of section
7
140.981;
8
(2) "Land taxes", taxes on real property or real
9
estate, i ncluding the taxes both on the land and the
10
improvements thereon;
11
(3) "Municipality", any incorporated city, town, or
12
village i n this state;
13
(4) "Political subdivision", any county, city, town,
14
village, school district, library district, or any other

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 8
15
public subdivision or public corporation that has the power
16
to tax;
17
(5) "Reserve period taxes", land taxes assessed
18
against a ny parcel of real estate sold or otherwise disposed
19
of by a land bank agency for the first three tax years
20
following such sale or disposition;
21
(6) "Tax bill", real estate taxes and the lien
22
thereof, whether general or special, levied and assessed by
23
any taxing authority;
24
(7) "Taxing authority", any governmental, managing,
25
administ e ring, or other lawful authority, now or hereafter
26
empowered by law to issue tax bills.
1
140.981. 1. Any county with more than one million
2
inhabitants m a y e s tablish a land bank agency for the
3
management, sale, transfer, and other disposition of
4
interests in real estate owned by such land bank agency.
5
Any such county may establish a land bank agency by
6
ordinance, resolution, or rule, as applicable. Such
7
ordinance, resolution, or rule shall specify t h e name of the
8
land bank agency. No county in which a land bank agency has
9
been established u nder the provisions of sections 141.980 to
10
141.1015 shall elect to establish a land bank agency under
11
this section.
12
2. Any municipality with more than one thousand five
13
hundred inhabitants not located within a county with more
14
than one million inhabitants may establish a land bank
15
agency for the management, sale, transfer, and other
16
disposition of interests in real estate owned by such land
17
bank agency. A municipality may establish a land bank
18
agency by or d inance, resolution, or rule, as applicable.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 9
19
3. A land bank agency shall not own any interest in
20
real es t ate located wholly or partially outside the [city]
21
municipality or county that established the land bank.
22
4. A land bank agency shall be established for the
23
purpose of returning land, including land that is in a non-
24
revenue-generating, non-tax-producing status, to use in
25
private ownership, or for public use.
26
5. A land bank agency created under the chapter 140
27
land ba n k act shall be a public body corporate and politic
28
and shall have permanent and perpetual duration until
29
terminated and dissolved in accordance with the provisions
30
of section 140.1012.
1
140.982. 1. If a county establishes a land bank
2
agency under s ubs e ction 1 of section 140.981, the members of
3
the first board of directors of a land bank agency shall be
4
appointed within ninety days after the effective date of the
5
ordinance, resolution, or rule passed establishing such land
6
bank agency. [If any appointing authority fails to make any
7
appointment o f a board member within the time the first
8
appointments are required, the appointment shall be made by
9
the county council. The following requirements shall apply
10
to the board of dir e ctors:
11
(1) The board of directors shall consist of seven
12
members:
13
(a) Two of whom shall be appointed by the county
14
executiv e , one of whom shall have professional expertise
15
relevant to the land bank agency;
16
(b) One of whom shall be appointed by the member of
17
the coun t y council representing the district with the
18
highest number of tax delinquent parcels. Such board member
19
shall maintain a primary residence within such district;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 10
20
(c) One of whom shall be appointed by the member of
21
the coun t y council representing the district with the second
22
highest number of tax delinquent parcels. Such board member
23
shall maintain a primary residence within such district;
24
(d) One of whom shall be appointed by consensus of the
25
county e x ecutive and the president of the municipal league
26
of the county; and
27
(e) Two of whom shall be resident representatives.
28
Resident representatives shall be appointed by a majorit y
29
vote of the other board members, and each resident
30
representative shall maintain a primary residence within one
31
of the twenty municipalities containing the highest
32
percentage of tax delinquent parcels;] The county council
33
may, as part of such ordinance, resolu t ion, or rule, provide
34
for the qualifications for members of the board of
35
directors. The board of directors of the land bank agency
36
shall consi st of seven members appointed by the county
37
executive pursuant to the authority vested in that office by
38
the county charter. The following requirements shall apply
39
to the board of dire ctors:
40
[(2)] (1) The term of office of a member shall be four
41
years. Eac h me m ber's primary residence shall be in the
42
county that has established the land bank agency. Each
43
member serves at the pleasure of the member's appo inting
44
authority, may be an employee of the appointing authority,
45
and shall serve without compensation;
46
[(3)] (2) No public officer shall be eligible to serve
47
as a board mem b er. For purposes of this subdivision,
48
"public officer" m e ans a person who is holding an elected
49
public office. Any public employee shall be eligible to
50
serve as a boa r d member;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 11
51
[(4)] (3) The members of the board shall select
52
annually f rom a mong themselves a chair, a vice chair, a
53
treasurer, and such other officers as the board may
54
determine and shall establish the officers' duties, as may
55
be regulated by rules adopted by the board;
56
[(5)] (4) The board shall establish rules and
57
requiremen ts r e lative to the attendance and participation of
58
members in its meetings, regular or special. Such rules and
59
regulations may prescribe a procedure whereby , if any member
60
fails to comply with such rules and regulations, such member
61
may be disqualified and removed automatically from office by
62
no less than a majority vote of the remaining members of the
63
board, and that member's position shall be vacant as of the
64
first day of the next calendar month. Any person removed
65
under the provisions of this subdivis i on shall be ineligible
66
for reappointment to the board unless such reappointment is
67
confirmed unanimously by the board;
68
[(6)] (5) A vacancy on the board shall be filled in
69
the same m anne r as the original appointment[. If any
70
appointing authority fails to make any appoin t ment of a
71
board member within sixty days after any term expires, the
72
appointment shall be made by the county council] within
73
sixty days and shall be done in compliance with the county
74
charter;
75
[(7)] (6) Board members shall serve without
76
compensati on. The board may reimburse any member for
77
expenses actu a lly incurred in the performance of duties on
78
behalf of the land bank agency;
79
[(8)] (7) The board shall have the power to organize
80
and reorga nize the executive, administrative, clerical, and
81
other departments of the land bank agency and to fix the

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 12
82
duties, powers, and compensation of all employees, agents,
83
and consultants of the land bank agency;
84
[(9)] (8) The board shall meet in regular session
85
according to a schedule adopted by the board and also shall
86
meet in special session as convened by the chair or upon
87
written notice signed by a majority of the members. The
88
presence of a majority of total membership, excludi n g
89
vacancies, shall constitute a quorum;
90
[(10)] (9) All actions of the board shall be approved
91
by the affir mat i ve vote of a majority of the members of that
92
board present and voting. However, no action of the board
93
shall be authorized on th e following matters unless approved
94
by a majority of the total board membership:
95
(a) Adoption, amendment, or repeal of bylaws and other
96
rules an d regulations for conduct of the land bank agency's
97
business;
98
(b) Hiring or firing of any employee or contractor of
99
the land bank agency. This function may, by majority vote,
100
be delegated by the bo ard to a specified officer or
101
committee of the land bank agency under such terms and
102
conditions and to the extent that the board may specify;
103
(c) Adoption or amendment of the annual budget; and
104
(d) Sale, encumbrance, or alienation of real property,
105
improvem e nts, or personal property;
106
[(11)] (10) The governing body of the county
107
establishing a l a nd bank agency may incur debt, including,
108
without limitation, borrowing moneys and issuing bonds,
109
notes, or other obligations to provide funding for the land
110
bank agency;
111
[(12)] (11) Members of a board shall not be liable
112
personally o n th e bonds or other obligations of the land

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 13
113
bank agency, and the rights of creditors shall be solely
114
against such land bank agency; and
115
[(13)] (12) Vote by proxy shall not be permitted. Any
116
member may r eque s t a recorded vote on any resolution or
117
action of the land bank agency.
118
2. If a municipality establishes a land bank agency
119
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981, the ordinance,
120
resolution, or rule, as applicable, may specify the
121
following:
122
(1) The name of the land bank agency;
123
(2) The number of members of the board of directors,
124
which sh a ll consist of an odd number of members and shall be
125
no fewer than five members nor more than eleven members;
126
(3) The initial individuals to serve as members of the
127
board of directors and the length of terms for which the
128
members are to serve; and
129
(4) The qualifications, manner of selection or
130
appointm e nt, and terms of office of members of the board.
131
3. A land bank agency may employ a secretary, an
132
executi v e director, its own counsel and legal staff,
133
technical experts, and other agents and employees, permanent
134
or temporary, as it may require and may determine the
135
qualifications and fix the compensation and benefits of such
136
persons. A land bank agency may also enter into contracts
137
and agre e ments with political subdivisions for staffing
138
services to be provided to the land bank agency by political
139
subdivisions or agencies or departments thereof, or for a
140
land bank agency to provide such staffing services to
141
political subdivisions or agencies or departments thereof.
1
140.983. A land bank agency established under the
2
chapter 140 l a nd bank act shall have all powers necessary or
3
appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes and

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 14
4
provisions of the chapter 140 land bank act, including the
5
following powers in addition to those herein otherwise
6
granted:
7
(1) To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws for the
8
regulati o n of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
9
(2) To sue and be sued, in its own name, and plead and
10
be imple a ded in all civil actions including, but not limited
11
to, actions to clear title to property of the land bank
12
agency;
13
(3) To adopt a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;
14
(4) To borrow from the political subdivision
15
establis h ing the land bank agency, as may be necessary for
16
the operation and work of the land bank agency;
17
(5) To procure insurance or guarantees from political
18
subdivis i ons, the state, the federal government, or any
19
other public or private sources of the payment of any bond,
20
note, loan, or other obligation, or portion thereof,
21
incurred by the land bank agency and to pay any fees or
22
premiums in connection therewith;
23
(6) To enter into contracts and other instruments
24
necessar y , incidental, or convenient to the performance of
25
its duties and the exercise of its powers including, but not
26
limited to, agreements with other land bank agencies and
27
with political subdivisions for the joint exercise of powers
28
under this chapter;
29
(7) To enter into contracts and other instruments
30
necessar y , incidental, or convenient to:
31
(a) The performance of functions by the land bank
32
agency o n behalf of political subdivisions, or agencies or
33
departments thereof; or

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 15
34
(b) The performance by political subdivisions, or
35
agencies or departments thereof, of functions on behalf of
36
the land bank agency;
37
(8) To make and execute contracts and other
38
instrume n ts necessary or convenient to the exercise of the
39
powers of the land bank agency;
40
(9) To procure insurance against losses in connection
41
with the property, assets, or activities of the land bank
42
agency;
43
(10) To invest the [moneys] money of the land bank
44
agency in the same manner as moneys are invested by the
45
state treasurer, including amounts deposited in reserve or
46
sinking funds, at the discretion of the land bank agency in
47
obligations or property determined proper by the land bank
48
agency and to name and use depositories for its moneys;
49
(11) To enter into contracts for the management of or
50
the sale o f the property of the land bank agency;
51
(12) To design, develop for public use, construct,
52
demolish, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, relocate,
53
equip, furnish, and otherwise improve real property or
54
rights or interests in real property held by the land bank
55
agency;
56
(13) To acquire property, whether by purchase,
57
exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise, except not property not
58
wholly located in the county or municipality that
59
established the land bank agency; to grant or acquire
60
licenses and easements; and to sell, grant an option with
61
respect to, or otherwise dispose of, any property of the
62
land bank agency;
63
(14) To enter into partnerships, joint ventures, and
64
other col l aborative relationships with political
65
subdivisions and other public and private entities for the

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 16
66
management, development, and disposition of real property,
67
except not for property not wholly located in the county or
68
municipality that established the land bank agency; and
69
(15) Subject to the other provisions of this chapter
70
and all o t her applicable laws, to do all other things
71
necessary or convenient to achieve the objectives and
72
purposes of the land bank agency or other laws that relate
73
to the purposes and responsibility of the land bank agency.
1
140.984. 1. The income of a land bank agency shall be
2
exempt from a l l t a xation by the state and by any of its
3
political subdivisions. Upon acquiring title to any real
4
estate, a land bank age n cy shall immediately notify the
5
county assessor and the county collector of such ownership;
6
all taxes, special taxes, fines, and fees on such real
7
estate shall be deemed satisfied by transfer to the land
8
bank agency; and such property shall be exempt from all
9
taxation during the land bank agency's ownership thereof, in
10
the same manner and to the same extent as any other publicly
11
owned real estate. Upon the sale or other disposition of
12
any real estate he l d by it, the land bank agency shall
13
immediately notify the county assessor and the county
14
collector of such change of ownership. However, that such
15
tax exemption for improved and occupie d real property held
16
by the land bank agency as a lessor pursuant to a ground
17
lease shall terminate upon the first occupancy[, and]. The
18
land bank agency shall immediately notify the county
19
assessor and the county collector of such occupancy.
20
2. A land bank agency may acquire real property by
21
gift, d e vise, transfer, exchange, foreclosure, purchase, or
22
pursuant to sections 141.560 to 141.580 or section 141.819,
23
except a land bank agency shall not acquire property located

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 17
24
partially or wholly outside the boundaries of the county or
25
municipality that established such land bank agency.
26
3. A land bank agency may acquire property by purchase
27
contrac t s, lease purchase agreements, installment sales
28
contracts, and land contracts and may accept transfers from
29
political subdivisions upon such terms and conditions as
30
agreed to by the land bank agency and the political
31
subdivision. A land bank agency may bid on any parcel of
32
real estate o ffered for sale, offered at a foreclosure sale
33
under sections 140.220 to 140.250, offered at a sale
34
conducted under section 140.190, 140.240, or 140.250, or
35
offered at a foreclosure sale under section 141.550.
36
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any po litical
37
subdivision may transfer to the land bank agency real
38
property and interests in real property of the political
39
subdivision on such terms and conditions and according to
40
such procedures as determined by the political subdivision.
41
4. A land bank agency shall maintain all of its real
42
propert y in accordance with the laws and ordinances of the
43
jurisdictions in which the real property is located.
44
5. Upon issuance of a deed to a parcel of real estate
45
to a la n d bank agency under subsection 4 of section 140.250,
46
subsection 5 of section 140.405, other sale conducted under
47
section 140.190, 140.240, or 140.250, or section 141.550,
48
the land bank agency shall pay only the amount of the land
49
bank agency's bid that exceeds the amount of all tax bills
50
included in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's
51
fees, taxes, and costs then due thereon. If the real estate
52
is acquired in a delinquent land tax auc t ion under
53
subsection 4 of section 140.250, subsection 5 of section
54
140.405, or other sale conducted under section 140.190,
55
140.240, or 140.250, such excess shall be applied and

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 18
56
distributed in accordance with section 140.230. If the real
57
estate is acquired in a delinquent land tax auct ion under
58
section 141.550, such excess shall be applied and
59
distributed in accordance with subsections 3 and 4 of
60
section 141.580, exclusive of subdivision (3) of subsection
61
3 of section 141.580. Upon issuance of a deed, the county
62
collector shall mark t he tax bills included in the judgment
63
as "cancelled by sale to the land bank" and shall take
64
credit for the full amount of such tax bills, including
65
principal amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and
66
costs, on the county collector's books and in the county
67
collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
68
6. A land bank shall not own real property unless the
69
propert y is wholly located within the boundaries of the
70
county or municipality that established the land bank agency.
71
7. Within one year of the effective date of the
72
ordinan c e, resolution, or rule passed establishing a
73
municipal land bank agency under subsection 2 of section
74
140.981, the title to any real property that is located
75
wholly within the municipality that created the land bank
76
agency and that is held by a land trust created under
77
subsection 1 of section 141.819 shall be transferred by deed
78
from the land trust to such land bank agency, at the land
79
bank agency's request.
1
140.985. 1. A land bank agency shall hold in its own
2
name all real pro p erty acquired by such land bank agency,
3
irrespective of the identity of the transferor of such
4
property.
5
2. A land bank agency shall maintain and make
6
availab l e for public review and inspection an inventory and
7
history of all real property the land bank agency holds or
8
formerly held. This inventory and history shall be

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 19
9
available on the land bank agency's website and include at a
10
minimum:
11
(1) Whether a parcel is available for sale;
12
(2) The address of the parcel if an address has been
13
assigned ;
14
(3) The parcel number if no address has been assigned;
15
(4) The month and year that a parcel entered the land
16
bank age n cy's inventory;
17
(5) Whether a parcel has sold;
18
(6) If a parcel has sold, the name of the person or
19
entity t o which it was sold; and
20
(7) Whether the parcel was acquired by the land bank
21
agency t h rough judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial
22
foreclosure, donation, or some other manner.
23
3. The land bank agency shall determine and set forth
24
in poli c ies and procedures the general terms and conditions
25
for consideration to be received by the land bank agency for
26
the transfer of real property and interests in real
27
property. Consideration may take the form of monetary
28
payments a nd secured financial obligations, covenants, and
29
conditions related to the present and future use of the
30
property; contractual commitments of the transferee; and
31
such other forms of consideration as the land bank agency
32
determines to be in the best interest of the land bank
33
agency.
34
4. A land bank agency may convey, exchange, sell,
35
transfe r , grant, release and demise, pledge, and hypothecate
36
any and all interests in, upon, or to property of the land
37
bank agency. A land bank agency may gift any interest in,
38
upon, or to p roperty to the county or municipality that
39
established the land bank agency.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 20
40
5. A county or municipality may, in its resolution,
41
ordinan c e, or rule creating a land bank agency, establish a
42
hierarchical ranking of priorities for the use of real
43
property conveyed by such land bank agency, including, but
44
not limited to:
45
(1) Use for purely public spaces and places;
46
(2) Use as wildlife conservation areas;
47
(3) Use as a green field area; and
48
(4) To return to private use.
49
If a county or municipality, in its resolution, ordinance,
50
or rule creating a land bank agency, establishes priorities
51
for the use of real property conveyed by the land bank
52
agency, such priorities shall be consistent with and no more
53
restrictive than municipal planning and zoning ordinances.
54
6. The land bank agency may delegate to officers and
55
employe e s the authority to enter into and execute
56
agreements, instruments of conveyance, and all other related
57
documents pertaining to the conveyance of property by the
58
land bank agency.
59
7. Any property sold by a land bank agency that was
60
acquire d through purchase, transfer, exchange, or gift shall
61
be sold.
62
8. When any parcel of real estate acquired by a land
63
bank ag e ncy is sold or otherwise disposed of by such land
64
bank agency, the proceeds therefrom shall be applied and
65
distributed in the following order:
66
(1) To the payment of the expenses of the sale;
67
(2) To fulfill the requirements of the resolution,
68
indentur e , or other financing documents adopted or entered
69
into in connection with bonds, notes, or other obligations
70
of the land bank agency, to the extent that such

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 21
71
requirements may apply with respect to such parcel of real
72
estate;
73
(3) To the land bank agency to pay the salaries and
74
other ex p enses of such land bank agency and of its employees
75
as provided for in its annual budget; and
76
(4) Any funds in excess of those necessary to meet the
77
expenses of the annual budget of the land bank agency in any
78
fiscal year and a reasonable sum to carry over into the next
79
fiscal year to assure that sufficient funds will be
80
available to meet initial expenses for that next fiscal year
81
shall be paid to the respective taxing authorities that, at
82
the time of the distribution, are taxing the real property
83
from which the proceeds are being distributed. The
84
distributions shall be in proportion to the am o unts of the
85
taxes levied on the properties by the taxing authorities.
86
Distribution shall be made on January first and July first
87
of each year, and at such other times as the land bank
88
agency may determine.
1
140.986. 1. No later than five years from the date it
2
acquired the p rop e rty, a land bank agency shall either sell,
3
put to a productive use, or show significant progress
4
towards selling or putting the property to a productive use
5
[a parcel of real property]. A productive use may be
6
demolishing all structures o f the property or using the
7
property for a community garden, park, or other open public
8
space. No later than eight years from the date it acquired
9
the pr o perty, a land bank agency shall sell, clear, or put
10
such property to public use.
11
2. The governing body of the county or municipality
12
may gra n t the land bank agency a one-year extension if the
13
body determines by a majority vote that unforeseen

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 22
14
circumstances have delayed the sale or productive use of a
15
parcel of property.
16
3. If a land bank agency owns a parcel of real
17
propert y that does not have a productive use after five
18
years, or does not receive an extension under subsection 2
19
of this section, the property shall be offered for public
20
sale using the procedures under sections 140.170 to 140.190.
1
140.987. 1. A land bank agency shall require that any
2
buyer demonst r ate that the buyer is not the owner of any
3
parcel of real estate within the county or municipality that
4
created the land bank agency for which a tax bill has been
5
delinquent for more than one year or is in violation of any
6
municipal building or housing code[, and is not the original
7
owner or relative of such owner within the second degree of
8
consanguinity of the parcel sold, transferred, exchanged, or
9
gifted to the land bank agency].
10
2. No foreign or domestic corporation or limited
11
liabili t y company that has failed to appoint or maintain a
12
registered agent under chapter 347 or 351 shall be eligible
13
to buy property from the land bank agency. No foreign
14
corporate entity shall be eligible to buy p roperty from the
15
land bank agency unless it has a certificate of authority to
16
transact business in Missouri under section 351.572.
17
3. As a condition of the sale or other authorized
18
conveya n ce of ownership of any parcel of land owned by the
19
land bank agency to a private owner, such owner may be
20
required to enter into a contract, which may be secured by a
21
deed of trust in favor of the land bank agency, stipulating
22
that such owner or the owner's successor agrees that such
23
owner or the owner's successor make certain improvements to
24
the parcel. If the land bank agency finds by resolution
25
that the ter ms of the contract have not been satisfied, the

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 23
26
land bank agency shall be authorized to bring suit to
27
recover damages for the breach and to seek a judicial
28
foreclosure of the parcel under sections 443.190 to 443.260,
29
except that upon final judgment of the court, title shall
30
revert to the land bank agency without necessity of sale.
31
As an alternative to, or in addition to, seeking a judici a l
32
foreclosure, the land bank agency may, only by gift, assign
33
or convey its right to foreclose under sections 443.190 to
34
443.260 to any 501(c)(3) tax-exempt nonprofit organization
35
or exercise the right of reentry under chapter 524, 527, or
36
534. The land bank agency or its assignee shall assume
37
titl e to the land by filing a copy of the judgment with the
38
recorder of deeds in the county where the property is
39
located. Any property redeemed by the land bank agency
40
under th e provisions of this section shall be administered
41
in the same manner as other property sold to the land bank
42
agency.
1
140.988. 1. (1) A land bank agency may receive
2
funding throu g h g r ants and gifts from political
3
subdivisions, the state, the federal government, and other
4
public and private sources.
5
(2) A land bank agency may receive funding through
6
gifts fr o m any source, provided that the land bank agency
7
shall not sell or otherwise transfer by any means any real
8
property held by the land bank agency to the entity from
9
which the land bank agency received a gift [pursuant to this
10
subdivision].
11
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 of
12
section 140.985, a land bank agency may receive and retain
13
payments for services rendered, for consideration for
14
disposition of real and personal property, for proceeds of
15
insurance coverage for losses incurred, for income from

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 24
16
investments, and for any other asset and activity lawfully
17
permitted to a land bank agency under the chapter 140 land
18
bank act.
19
3. If a land bank agency sells or otherwise disposes
20
of a pa r cel of real estate held by it, any land taxes
21
assessed against such parcel for the three tax years
22
following such sale or disposition by such land bank agency
23
that are collected by the county collector in a calendar
24
year and not refunded, less the fees provided under section
25
52.260 and subsection 4 of this section and less the amounts
26
to be deducted under section 137.720, shall be distributed
27
by the county collector to such land bank agency no later
28
than March first of the following calendar year, provided
29
that land taxes impounded under section 139.031 or otherwise
30
paid under protest shall not be subject to distribution
31
under this subsection. Any amount required to be
32
distributed to a land b ank agency under this subsection
33
shall be subject to offset for amounts previously
34
distributed to such land bank agency that were assessed,
35
collected, or distributed in error.
36
4. In addition to any other provisions of law related
37
to coll e ction fees, the county collector shall collect on
38
behalf of the county a fee of four percent of reserve period
39
taxes collected and such fees collected shall be deposited
40
in the county general fund.
41
5. If a county has established a land bank agency
42
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981, the collector may
43
collect on behalf of the county a fee for the collection of
44
delinquent and back taxes of up to five percent on all sums
45
collected to be added to the face of the tax bill and
46
collected from the party paying the tax. All fees collected
47
under the provisions of this subsection s hall be paid to the

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 25
48
land bank agency established under subsection 1 of section
49
140.981.
1
140.991. 1. There shall be an annual audit of the
2
affairs, acco u nts , expenses, and financial transactions of a
3
land bank agency by a certified public accountant before
4
April thirtieth of each year, which accountant shall be
5
employed by the land bank agency on or before March first of
6
each year. Certified copies of the audit shall be furnished
7
to the cou n ty or municipality that established the land bank
8
agency, and the county or municipality shall post the audit
9
on its [public] website. Copies of the audit shall also be
10
available for public ins p ection at the office of the land
11
bank agency.
12
2. The land bank agency may be performance audited at
13
any tim e by the state auditor or by the auditor of the
14
county or municipality that established the land bank
15
agency. The land bank agency shall make copies of such
16
audit a v ailable to the public and shall post a copy of the
17
audit on the land bank agency's website within thirty days
18
of the completion of the audit.
1
140.994. 1. A land bank agency shall have power to
2
receive funds fro m bonds issued by the county or
3
municipality that created the land bank agency, for any of
4
its [corporate] purposes. The bonds shall be special,
5
limited obligations of th e county or municipality that
6
created the land bank agency, the principal of and interest
7
on which shall be payable solely from the income and revenue
8
derived from the sale, or other disposition of the assets of
9
the land bank agency, or such portion thereof as may be
10
designated in the resolution, indenture, or other financing
11
documents relating to the issuance of the bonds.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 26
12
2. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be
13
deemed t o be an indebtedness within the meaning of any
14
constitutional or statutory limitation upon the incurring of
15
indebtedness. The bonds shall not constitute a debt,
16
liability, or obligation of the state or a pledge of the
17
full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state and
18
the bonds shall contain a recital to that effect. Neither
19
the members of the board nor any person executing the bonds
20
shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the
21
issuance thereof.
22
3. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be
23
authori z ed by resolution of the governing body of the county
24
or municipality establishing the land bank agency, shall be
25
issued in such form, shall be in such denominations, shall
26
bear interest at such rate or rates, shall mature on such
27
dates and in such manner, shall be subject to redemption at
28
such times and on such terms, and shall be executed by one
29
or more members of the governing body of the county or
30
municipality establishing the land bank agency, as provided
31
in the resolution authorizing the issuance thereof or as set
32
out in the indenture or other financing document authorized
33
and approved by such resolution. The governing body of the
34
county or municipality establish i ng the land bank agency may
35
sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or at
36
private sale, and for such price as the governing body of
37
the county or municipality establishing the land bank agency
38
may determine to be in the best interests of the land bank
39
agency.
40
4. A governing body of the county or municipality
41
establi s hing the land bank agency may from time to time, as
42
authorized by resolution of the governing body, issue
43
refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding, extending, and

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 27
44
unifying all or any part of its valid outstanding bonds.
45
Such refunding bonds may be payable from any of the sour c es
46
identified in subsection 1 of this section and from the
47
investment of any of the proceeds of the refunding bonds.
48
5. The bonds issued by the governing body of the
49
county o r municipality establishing the land bank agency
50
shall be negotiable instruments under chapter 400.
51
6. Bonds issued under this section and all income or
52
interes t thereon shall be exempt from all state taxes.
53
7. The governing body of the county or municipality
54
establi s hing the land bank agency shall have the power to
55
issue temporary notes upon the same terms and subject to all
56
provisions and restrictions applicable to bonds under this
57
section. Such notes issued by the governing body may be
58
refunded by notes or bonds authorized under this section.
1
140.995. Notwithstanding any provision of sections
2
140.980 to 14 0 .995 to the contrary, a land bank agency may
3
rent or lease property held by the land bank agency for any
4
community, noncommercial, or agricultural uses.
1
140.1000. 1. No board member or employee of a land
2
bank agency sh a ll r eceive any compensation, emolument, or
3
other profit directly or indirectly from the rental,
4
management, acquisition, sale, demolition, repair,
5
rehabilitation, use, operation, ownership, or disposition of
6
any [lands] property held by such land bank agency other
7
than the salaries, expenses, and emoluments provided for in
8
the chapter 140 land bank act.
9
2. No member of the board or employee of a land bank
10
agency s hall own, directly or indirectly, any legal or
11
equitable interest in or to any lands held by such land bank
12
agency other than the salaries, expenses, and emoluments
13
provided for in sections 140.980 to 140.1015.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 28
14
3. A violation of this section is a class D felony.
15
4. The land bank agency may adopt supplemental rules
16
and reg u lations addressing potential conflicts of interest
17
and ethical guidelines for board members and land bank
18
agency employees, provided that such rules and regulations
19
are not inconsistent with this chapter or any other
20
applicable law.
21
5. Any person who is related to a board member or
22
employe e of a land bank agency within the second degree of
23
consanguinity or affinity shall be considered a board member
24
or employee of a land bank agency for purposes of this
25
section and subject to its provisions.
1
140.1009. 1. A land bank agency shall be authorized
2
to file an act i on t o quiet title under section 527.150 [as
3
to] for any real property in which the land bank agency has
4
an interest. For purposes of any and all such actions, the
5
land bank ag e ncy shall be deemed to be the holder of
6
sufficient legal and equitable interests, and possessory
7
rights, so as to qualify the land bank agency as an adequate
8
petitioner in such action.
9
2. Prior to the filing of an action to quiet title,
10
the lan d bank agency shall conduct an examination of title
11
to determine the identity of any and all persons and
12
entities possessing a claim or interest in or to the real
13
property. Service of the petition to quiet title shall be
14
provided t o all such interested parties by the following
15
methods:
16
(1) Registered or certified mail to such identity and
17
address a s reasonably ascertainable by an inspection of
18
public records;
19
(2) In the case of occupied real property, by first
20
class ma i l addressed to "Occupant";

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 29
21
(3) By posting a copy of the notice on the real
22
property ;
23
(4) By publication in a newspaper of general
24
circulat i on in the county or municipality in which the
25
property is located; and
26
(5) Such other methods as the court may order or as
27
may be r e quired by prevailing motions of due process.
28
3. As part of the petition to quiet title, the land
29
bank ag e ncy shall file an affidavit identifying all parties
30
potentially having an interest in the real property and the
31
form of notice provided.
32
4. The court shall schedule a hearing on the petition
33
within n inety days following filing of the petition and, as
34
to all matters upon which an answer was not filed by an
35
interested party, the court shall issue its final judgment
36
within one hundred twenty days of the filing of the petition.
37
5. A land bank agency shall be authorized to join in a
38
single p etition to quiet title one or more parcels of real
39
property.
1
140.1012. 1. A land bank agency shall be dissolved as
2
a public body c orp o rate and politic no sooner than sixty
3
calendar days, but no later than one hundred eighty calendar
4
days, after an ordinance or resolution for such dissolution
5
is passed by the county or municipality that established the
6
land bank agency.
7
2. [No less than sixty calendar days' advance written
8
notice o f consideration of] If such an ordinance or
9
resolution of dissolution is being considered, no less than
10
sixty calendar days advance written notice shall be given to
11
the land bank agency, shall be published in a local
12
newspaper of general circulation within such county or

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 30
13
municipality, and shall be sent certified mail to each
14
trustee of any outstanding bonds of the land bank agency.
15
3. No land bank agency shall be dissolved while there
16
remains any outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations
17
of the land bank agency unless such bonds, notes, or other
18
obligations are paid or defeased pursuant to the resolution,
19
indenture, or other financing document under which such
20
bonds, notes, or other obligations were issued prior to or
21
simultaneously with such dissolution. Once all outstanding
22
bonds, notes, or other obligations ar e satisfied, no new
23
property shall be purchased by, gifted to, traded to, or
24
exchanged with the land bank agency. No further debts or
25
other obligations shall be incurred o ther than that which is
26
necessary to sell or put to public use any remaining
27
property held by the land bank agency. The land bank agency
28
shall be dissolved within thirty days a fter all outstanding
29
bonds, notes, or other obligations are satisfied.
30
4. Upon dissolution of a land bank agency pursuant to
31
this se c tion, all real property, personal property, and
32
other assets of the land bank agency shall be transferred by
33
appropriate written instrument to and shall become the
34
assets of the county or municipality that established the
35
land bank agency. Such county or municipality shall act
36
expeditiously to r eturn such real property to the tax rolls
37
and shall market and sell such real property using an open,
38
public method that ensures the best possible prices are
39
realized while ensuring such real property is returned to a
40
suitable, productive use for the betterment of the
41
neighborhood in which such real property is located. Upon
42
the sale or other disposition of any such property b y such
43
county or municipality, the proceeds therefrom shall be
44
applied and distributed in the following order:

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 31
45
(1) To the payment of the expenses of sale;
46
(2) To the reasonable costs incurred by such county or
47
municipa l ity in maintaining and marketing such property; and
48
(3) The balance shall be paid to the respective taxing
49
authorit i es that, at the time of the distribution, are
50
taxing the real property from which the proceeds are being
51
distributed.
1
141.220. The following words, terms and definitions,
2
when used in s ections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections
3
141.980 to 141.1015, shall have the meanings ascribed to
4
them in this section, except where the text clearly
5
indicates a different meaning:
6
(1) "Ancillary parcel" shall mean a parcel of real
7
estate a c quired by a land bank agency other than:
8
(a) Pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of
9
section 1 41.560;
10
(b) By deed from a land trust under subsection 1 of
11
section 1 41.984; or
12
(c) Pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of
13
subsecti o n 2 of section 141.550;
14
(2) "Appraiser" shall mean a state licensed or
15
certifie d appraiser licensed or certified pursuant to
16
chapter 339 who is not an employee of the collector or
17
collection authority;
18
(3) "Board" or "board of commissioners" shall mean the
19
board of commissioners of a land bank agency;
20
(4) "Collector" shall mean the collector of the
21
revenue i n any county affected by sections 141.210 to
22
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015;
23
(5) "County" shall mean any county in this state;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 32
24
(6) "Court" shall mean the circuit court of any county
25
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
26
to 141.1015;
27
(7) "Delinquent land tax attorney" shall mean a
28
licensed attorney-at-law, employed or designated by the
29
collector as hereinafter provided;
30
(8) "Interested party", shall mean any person with a
31
legal in t erest in a parcel of land affected by sections
32
141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
33
Interested party shall not include:
34
(a) The holder of the benefit or burden of any
35
easement or right of way;
36
(b) The holder of a benefit or burden of a real
37
covenant ; or
38
(c) A leasehold owner of subsurface mineral, gas, or
39
oil righ t s whose interest is properly recorded and whose
40
interest shall remain unaffected;
41
(9) "Land bank agency", shall mean [an] any agency
42
created u nder section 141.980;
43
(10) "Land taxes" shall mean taxes on real property or
44
real esta t e and shall include the taxes both on land and the
45
improvements thereon;
46
(11) "Land trustees" and "land trust" shall mean the
47
land trus t ees and land trust as the same are created by and
48
described in section 141.700;
49
(12) "Municipality" shall include any incorporated
50
city or t o wn, or a part thereof, located in whole or in part
51
within a county;
52
(13) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm,
53
copartner s hip, joint adventure, association, corporation,
54
estate, trust, business trust, receiver or trustee appointed
55
by any state or federal court, trustee otherwise created,

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 33
56
syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a
57
unit, and the plural as well as the singular number;
58
(14) "Political subdivision" shall mean any county,
59
city, tow n , village, school district, library district, or
60
any other public subdivision or public corporation having
61
the power to tax;
62
(15) "Reserve period taxes" shall mean land taxes
63
assessed a gainst any parcel of real estate sold or otherwise
64
disposed of by a land bank agency for the first three tax
65
years following such sale or disposition;
66
(16) "School district", "road district", "water
67
district" , "sewer district", "levee district", "drainage
68
district", "special benefit district", "special assessment
69
district", or "park district" shall include those located
70
within a county as such county is described in this section;
71
(17) "Sheriff" and "circuit clerk" shall mean the
72
sheriff a n d circuit clerk, respectively, of any county
73
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
74
to 141.1015;
75
(18) "Tax bill" as used in sections 141.210 to 141.810
76
and secti o ns 141.980 to 141.1015 shall represent real estate
77
taxes and the lien thereof, whether general or special,
78
levied and assessed by any taxing authority;
79
(19) "Tax district" shall mean the state of Missouri
80
and any c o unty, municipality, school district, road
81
district, water district, sewer district, levee district,
82
drainage district, special benefit district, special
83
assessment district, or park district, located in any
84
municipality or county as herein described;
85
(20) "Tax lien" shall mean the lien of any tax bill as
86
defined i n this section;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 34
87
(21) "Taxing authority" shall include any
88
governmen t al, managing, administering or other lawful
89
authority, now or hereafter empowered by law to issue tax
90
bills, the state of Missouri or any county, municipality,
91
school district, road district, water district, sewer
92
district, levee district, drainage district, special benefit
93
district, special assessment district, or park district,
94
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
95
to 141.1015.
1
141.230. 1. The land tax collection law shall apply
2
to all counti e s t h at have elected to operate under the
3
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 by adoption of a
4
resolution or order of the county commission of such county.
5
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a
6
resolut i on or order of the county commission of such county,
7
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
8
141.810 as a partial opt-in county. After adoption of any
9
such resolution or order, the colle c tor for such county may
10
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
11
141.810 for any parcel [or parcels for which there is an
12
unpaid tax bill for a period of at least two years after the
13
date on which it became delinquent].
14
3. No county eligible to establish a land bank agency
15
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981 shall elect to operate
16
as a partial opt-in county unless having first elected to
17
establish a land bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of
18
section 140.981.
19
4. Any county commission so adopting such resolution
20
or orde r shall file a certified copy thereof within ten days
21
after the adoption of said resolution or order with the
22
clerk of the county commission and with the collector of
23
revenue for such county, and with the mayor and city

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 35
24
collector or chief financial officer of each municipality in
25
such county, as defined by section 141.220.
26
5. After the adoption of such resolution or order by
27
such co u nty commission, each municipality shall cooperate
28
with such county under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
29
141.810. Any such county which shall, in the manner
30
provided herein, have elected to come within the provisions
31
of sections 141.210 to 141.810, in whole or in part, by
32
adoption of such resolution, order or ordinance, may, after
33
a period of one year from the effective date of such
34
resolution, order or ordinance, adopt by similar means a
35
resolution, order or ordinance, rescinding the election to
36
adopt the provisions of the land tax collection law and
37
certified copies of such resolution, order or ordinance
38
shall be filed in the same manner as said original
39
resolution, order or ordinance; provided, that such
40
resolution, order or ordinance rescinding or nullifying the
41
election to adopt the provisions of sections 141.210 to
42
141.810 shall not become effective for one year thereafter
43
nor shall it invalidate or in any way affect any proceedings
44
in rem for foreclosure which may have been instituted under
45
the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810, but all such
46
actions and proceedings so instituted while the provisions
47
of said sections were in full force and effect shall be
48
prosecuted to their conclusion and completion; provided
49
further, that any county which may have operated under
50
sections 141.210 to 141.810 prior to the enactment of this
51
section may hereafter elect to terminate any further
52
operation under sections 141.210 to 141.810 by proceeding in
53
manner and form and to the same effect as though it had
54
originally elected to operate under the provisions of
55
sections 141.210 to 141.810.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 36
56
6. Any municipality located partly within a county
57
electin g to operate in whole or in part under the provisions
58
of sections 141.210 to 141.810 shall cooperate with such
59
county under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810;
60
provided, however, that tax bills imposed against real
61
estate located in that part of such municipality outside of
62
the limits of any such county shall be collected under other
63
provisions as may be provided by law.
1
141.250. 1. The respective liens of the tax bills for
2
general taxes of t he state of Missouri, the county, any
3
municipality, and any school district, for the same tax
4
year, shall be equal and first liens upon the real estate
5
described in the respective tax bills thereof; provided,
6
however, that the liens of such tax bills for the latest
7
year for which tax bills are unpaid shall take priority over
8
the liens of tax bills levied and assessed for less recent
9
years, and the lien of such tax bills shall rate in priority
10
in the order of the years for which the tax bills are
11
delinquent, the lien of the tax bill longest delinquent
12
being junior in priority to the lien of the tax bill for the
13
next most recent tax year.
14
2. All tax bills for other than general taxes shall
15
constit u te liens junior to the liens for general taxes upon
16
the real estate described therein; provided, however, that a
17
tax bill for other than general taxes, of the more recent
18
issue shall likewise be senior to any such tax bill of less
19
recent date.
20
3. The proceeds derived from the sale of any lands
21
encumbe r ed with a tax lien or liens shall be distributed to
22
the owners of such liens in the order of the seniority of
23
the liens. Those holding liens of equal rank shall share in
24
direct pro p ortion to the amounts of their respective liens.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 37
1
141.270. 1. On or before the fifth day of January in
2
each year, al l ta x ing authorities and any other tax bill
3
owner shall file a list with the collector [a list] on a
4
form approved by the collector of all parcels of real estate
5
affected by tax liens held and owned by such taxing
6
authority or person which have been delinquent for two years
7
or more. Such list shall also include all delinquent tax
8
bills fo r any and all years.
9
2. The taxing authority or person filing such list
10
shall p a y to the collector a filing fee of one dollar and
11
fifty cents for each parcel of real estate described
12
therein, which fee shall be charged against each parcel and
13
collected and accounted for by the collector as other costs.
14
3. No school district nor any other taxing authority
15
whose t a xes are required by law to be collected by the
16
collector shall file any list nor pay the filing fee herein
17
provided.
18
4. If the taxes of any taxing authority are two or
19
more ye a rs delinquent, the other taxing authorities and
20
other tax bill owners shall include in the said list all tax
21
liens against the said parcel, even though the taxes are not
22
two years delinquent.
1
141.290. 1. The collector shall compile lists of all
2
state, county , sc h ool, and other tax bills collectible by
3
the collector that are delinquent according to the
4
collector's records, and the collector shall combine such
5
lists with the list filed by any taxing authority or tax
6
bill owner.
7
2. For partial opt-in counties, the collector shall
8
decide w hich tax delinquent parcels shall proceed according
9
to the provisions contained [herein] in this chapter. The

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 38
10
remaining parcels shall proceed under such other provisions
11
as may be provided by law.
12
3. The collector shall assign a serial number to each
13
parcel o f real estate in each list and if suit has been
14
filed in the circuit court of the county on any delinquent
15
tax bill included in any list, the collector shall give the
16
court docket number of such suit and some appropriate
17
designation of the place where such suit is pending, and
18
such pending suit so listed in any petition filed pursuant
19
to the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
20
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall, without further
21
procedure or court order, be deemed to be consolidated with
22
the suit brought under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
23
sections 141.980 to 141.1015, and such pending suit shall
24
thereupon be abated.
25
4. The collector shall deliver such combined lists to
26
the del i nquent land tax attorney from time to time but not
27
later than April first of each year.
28
5. The delinquent land tax attorney shall incorporate
29
such li s ts in petitions in the form prescribed in section
30
141.410, and shall file such petitions with the circuit
31
clerk not later than June first of each year.
1
141.300. 1. The collector shall receipt for the
2
aggregate amo u nt o f such delinquent tax bills appearing on
3
the list or lists filed with the collector under the
4
provisions of section 141.290, which receipt shall be held
5
by the owner or holder of the tax bills or by the treasurer
6
or other corresponding financial officer of the taxing
7
authority [so] filing such list with the collector.
8
2. The collector shall, on or before the fifth day of
9
each mo n th, file with the owner or holder of any tax bill or
10
with the treasurer or other corresponding financial officer

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 39
11
of any taxing authority, a detailed statement, verified by
12
affidavit, of all taxes collected by the collector during
13
the preceding month which appear on the list or lists
14
received by the collector, and shall, on or before the
15
fifteenth day of the month, pay the same, less the
16
collector's commissions and costs payable to the county, to
17
the tax bill owner or holder or to the treasurer or other
18
corresponding financial officer of any taxing authority;
19
provided, however, that the collector shall be given credit
20
for the full amount of any tax bill where title to the real
21
estate described in such tax bill is taken by a land trust,
22
or which is bid on by a land bank agency and where title to
23
the real estate described in such tax bill is taken by such
24
land bank agency pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection
25
3 of section 141.560, or which is included in the bid of a
26
land bank agency and where title to the real estate
27
described in such tax bill is taken by such land bank agency
28
pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
29
section 141.550.
1
141.320. 1. The collector shall, at the collector's
2
option, appoi n t a delinquent land tax attorney, to be
3
compensated as necessary for the performance of the
4
collector's duties under this chapter, or in counties having
5
a county counselor, the collector shall, at the collector's
6
option, designate the county counselor and such of the
7
counselor's assistants as shall appear necessary to act as
8
the delinquent land tax attorney.
9
2. A delinquent land tax attorney who is not the
10
county c ounselor, with the approval of the collector, may
11
appoint one or more assistant delinquent land tax attorneys
12
and such clerical employees as may be necessary, to be
13
compensated as necessary for the performance of duties under

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 40
14
this chapter; and the appointed delinquent tax attorney may
15
incur such reasonable expenses as are necessary for the
16
performance of the attorney's duties.
17
3. The delinquent land tax attorney and the attorney's
18
assista n ts shall perform legal services for the collector
19
and shall act as attorney for the collector in the
20
prosecution of all suits brought for the collection of land
21
taxes; but the attorney and the collector shall not perform
22
legal services for the land trust or any land bank agency.
23
4. Salaries and expenses of a delinquent land tax
24
attorne y who is not also the county counselor, the
25
attorney's assistants, and the attorney's employees shall be
26
paid monthly out of the treasury of the county from the same
27
funds as employees of the collector whenever the funds
28
provided for by sections 141.150, 141.270, and 141.620 are
29
not sufficient for such purpose.
30
5. The compensation herein provided shall be the total
31
compens a tion for a delinquent land tax attorney who is not
32
also a county counselor, and the attorney's assistants and
33
employees.
34
6. A delinquent land tax attorney who is not also the
35
county c ounselor shall make a return quarterly to the county
36
commission of such county of all compensation received by
37
the attorney, and of all amounts owing to the attorney by
38
the collector, and of all salaries and expenses of any
39
assistants and employees, stating the same in detail, and
40
verifying such amounts by affidavit.
41
7. The attorney's fees shall be taxed as costs in the
42
suit an d collected as other costs.
1
141.330. The collector [annually] may appoint one
2
delinquent la n d tax clerk in each office lawfully maintained
3
by the collector in the county, to be compensated as

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 41
4
necessary for the performance of the clerk's duties under
5
this chapter.
1
141.360. All suits for the foreclosure of tax liens
2
brought by th e collector shall name the collector only by
3
the title of the collector's office, and all such suits
4
shall be brought directly against the real estate subject to
5
the tax lien or liens to be foreclosed.
1
141.410. 1. A suit for the foreclosure of the tax
2
liens herein p rov i ded for shall be instituted by filing in
3
the appropriate office of the circuit clerk a petition[,
4
which]. Such petition shall contain a caption, a copy of
5
the lis t so furnished to the delinquent land tax attorney by
6
the collector, and a prayer. The petition shall name each
7
person with a legal interest in the parcel of land affected
8
by the suit, as reasonably discoverable to the collector
9
from publicly available records. Such petition without
10
further allegation shall be deeme d to be sufficient.
11
2. The caption shall be in the following form:
12
In the Circuit Court of ______ County, Missouri,
13
In the Matter of
14
Foreclosure of Liens for Delinquent Land Taxes
15
By Action in Rem.
16
Collector of Revenue of ______ County, Missouri,
17
Plaintiff
18
-vs.-
19
Parcels of Land Encumbered with Delinquent Tax
20
Liens
21
Defendants

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 42
22
3. The petition shall contain at least the following
23
informa t ion:
24
(1) The identity of the petitioner and the name and
25
address o f the collector;
26
(2) The parcel's common street address;
27
(3) A full legal description for the parcel;
28
(4) The tax identification number of the parcel;
29
(5) The period of tax delinquency; and
30
(6) The principal amount of delinquent taxes, together
31
with int e rest, penalties, and fees.
32
4. The petition shall conclude with a prayer that all
33
tax lie n s upon such real estate be foreclosed; that the
34
court determine the amounts and priorities of all tax bills,
35
together with interest, penalties, costs, and attorney's
36
fees; that the court order such real estate to be sold by
37
the sheriff at public sale as provided by sections 141.210
38
to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015 and that
39
thereafter a report of such sale be made by the sheriff to
40
the court for further proceedings under sections 141.210 to
41
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
42
5. The delinquent land tax attorney within ten days
43
after t h e filing of any such petition shall forward by
44
United States registered mail to each person or taxing
45
authority having filed a list of delinquent tax bills with
46
the collector as provided by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
47
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 a notice of the time and place
48
of the filing of such petition and of the newspaper in which
49
the notice of publication has been or will be published.
50
6. The petition when so filed shall have the same
51
force a n d effect with respect to each parcel of real estate
52
therein described, as a separate suit instituted to

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 43
53
foreclose the tax lien or liens against any one of said
54
parcels of real estate.
1
141.440. 1. Within thirty days after the filing of
2
such petition , th e collector shall [also] cause to be
3
prepared and sent by restricted, registered or certified
4
mail with postage prepaid, [within thirty days after the
5
filing of such petition,] a notice of the petition, to the
6
persons named in the petition as being the last known
7
persons in whose names tax bills affecting the respective
8
parcels of real estate described in said petition were last
9
billed or charged on the books of the collector, or the last
10
known owner of record, if different, and to the addresses of
11
said persons upon said records of the collector. The terms
12
"restricted", "registered" or "certified mail" a s used in
13
this section mean mail which carries on the face thereof in
14
a conspicuous place, where it will not be obliterated, the
15
endorsement "DELIVER TO ADDRESSEE ONLY", and which also
16
requires a return receipt or a statement by the postal
17
authorities that the addressee refused to receive and
18
receipt for such mail. If the notice is returned to the
19
collector by the posta l authorities as undeliverable for
20
reasons other than the refusal by the addressee to receive
21
and receipt for the notice as shown by the return receipt,
22
then the collector shall make a search of the records
23
maintained by the county, including those kept by the
24
recorder of deeds, to discern the name and address of any
25
person who, from such records, appears as a successor to the
26
person to whom the original notice was addressed, and to
27
cause another notice to be mailed to such person. The
28
collector shall prepare and file with the circuit clerk at
29
least thirty days before judgment is entered by the court on
30
the petition an affidavit reciting to the court any name,

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 44
31
address and serial number of the tract of real estate
32
affected by any such notices of suit that are undeliverable
33
because of an addressee's refusal to receive and receipt for
34
the same, or of any notice otherwise nondeliverable by mail,
35
or in the event that any name or address does not appear on
36
the records of the collector, then of that fact. The
37
affidavit in addition to the recitals set forth a bove shall
38
also state reason for the nondelivery of such notice.
39
2. The collector shall prepare and send, by first-
40
class m a il, a copy of the petition within thirty days after
41
the filing of such a petition to the occupant of such parcel
42
or property.
1
141.500. 1. After the trial of the issues, the court
2
shall, as pro m ptl y as circumstances permit, render
3
judgment. If the court finds that no tax bill upon the land
4
collectib l e by the collector or the relator was delinquent
5
when the suit was instituted or tried, then the judgment of
6
the court shall be that the cause be dismissed as to the
7
parcels of real estate described in the tax bill[; or,]. If
8
the evidence warrant, the judgment may be for the princi p al
9
amount of the delinquent tax bills upon the real estate upon
10
which suit was brought, together with interest, penalties,
11
attorney's and appraiser's fees and costs computed as of the
12
date of the judgment. The judgment may recite the amount of
13
each tax bill, the dat e when it began to bear interest, and
14
the rate of such interest, together with the rate and amount
15
of penalties, attorney's and appraiser's fees not to exceed
16
fifteen dollars. It may decree that the lien upon the
17
parcels of real e state described in the tax bill be
18
foreclosed and such real estate sold by the sheriff, and the
19
cause shall be continued for further proceedings, as herein
20
provided.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 45
21
2. The collector shall cause to be prepared and sent
22
by rest r icted, registered or certified mail with postage
23
prepaid, within thirty days after the rendering of such
24
judgment, a brief notice of such judgment and the
25
availability of a written redemption contract pursuant to
26
section 141.530 to the persons named in the judgment as
27
being the last known persons in whose names tax bills
28
affecting the respective parcels of real estate described in
29
such judgment were last billed or charged on the books of
30
the collector, or the last known owner of record, if
31
different, and to the addresses of such persons upon the
32
records of the collector. The terms "restricted",
33
"registered" or "certifie d mail" as used in this section
34
mean mail which carries on the face thereof in a conspicuous
35
place, where it will not be obliterated, the endorsement,
36
"DELIVER TO ADDRESSEE ONLY", and which also requires a
37
return receipt or a statement by the postal authorities that
38
the addressee refused to receive and receipt for such mail.
39
If the notice is returned to the collector by the postal
40
authorities as undeliverable for reasons other than the
41
refusal by the addressee to receive and receipt for the
42
notice as shown by the return receipt, then the collector
43
shall make a search of the records maintained by the county,
44
including those kept by the recorder of deeds, to discern
45
the name and address of any person who, from such records,
46
appears as a successor to the person to whom the original
47
notice was addressed, and to cause another notice to be
48
mailed to such person. The collector shall prepare and file
49
with the circuit clerk prior to confirmation hearings an
50
affidavit reciting to the court any name, address and serial
51
number of the tract of real estate affected of any such
52
notices of judgment that are undeliverable because of an

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 46
53
addressee's refusal to receive and receipt for the same, or
54
of any notice otherwise nondeliverable by mail, or in the
55
event that any name or address does not appear on the
56
records of the collector, then of that fact. The affidavit
57
in addition to the recitals set forth above s hall also state
58
reason for the nondelivery of such notice.
59
3. The collector shall prepare and send to the
60
occupan t of such parcel or property, by first-class mail, a
61
copy of the judgment of foreclosure within thirty days after
62
the date of such judgment.
1
141.520. 1. After the judgment of foreclosure has
2
been entered, or, after a motion for a new trial has been
3
overruled, or, if an appeal be taken from such judgment and
4
the judgment has been affirmed, after the sheriff shall have
5
been notified by any party to the suit that such judgment
6
has been affirmed on appeal and that the mandate of the
7
appellate court is on file with the circuit clerk, there
8
shall be a waiting period of six months before any
9
advertisement of sheriff's sale shall be published.
10
2. If any such parcel of real estate [be] is not
11
redeeme d , or if no written contract providing for redemption
12
[be] is made within six months after the date of the
13
judgment of foreclosure, if no motion for rehearing [be] is
14
filed, and, if filed, within six months after such motion
15
may have been overruled, or, if an appeal [be] is taken from
16
such judgment and the judgment [be] is affirmed, within six
17
months after the sheriff shall have been notified by any
18
party to the suit that such judgment has been affirmed on
19
appeal and that the mandate of the appellate court is on
20
file with the circuit clerk, the sheriff shall commence to
21
advertise the real estate described in the judgment and
22
shall fix the date of sale within thirty days after the date

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 47
23
of the first publication of the notice of sheriff's sale as
24
herein provided, and shall at such sale proceed to sell the
25
real estate.
26
3. Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary
27
notwith s tanding, the owner of any parcel of real property
28
against which a judgment has been rendered shall not have
29
the right to redeem such property from said judgment if at
30
the time of judgment such property is assessed as
31
residential property and the judgment finds the property has
32
been vacant for a period of not less than six months prior
33
to the judgment. After a judgment as provided for in this
34
section becomes f inal, the waiting period shall not apply to
35
such judgment and a sale under execution of the judgment
36
shall be immediately held as provided under the applicable
37
provisions of this chapter.
38
4. In partial opt-in counties, no later than one
39
hundred twenty days prior to the sheriff's sale, the
40
collector shall obtain from a licensed title company or
41
attorney a title search that includes all conveyances,
42
liens, and charges against the real estate involved in the
43
suit for any parcel of real estate against which the
44
collector has obtained a judgment under section 141.500 and
45
for which it has been decreed that the lien upon the parcel
46
of real estate described in the tax bill be foreclosed and
47
such real estate sold by the sheriff. The charge of such
48
title search may be recovered from th e proceeds of the sale
49
under section 141.580.
50
5. After obtaining or conducting a title search, the
51
collect o r shall initiate a search of the following records
52
to identify and locate interested parties and addresses
53
reasonably calculated to apprise interested parties of the
54
suit:

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 48
55
(1) Land title records in the office of the county
56
recorder of deeds;
57
(2) Tax records in the office of the local treasurer;
58
(3) Tax records in the office of the local assessor;
59
(4) A search of court records in Missouri CaseNet; and
60
(5) For a business entity, records filed with the
61
secretar y of state.
62
The collector may also incur reasonable costs for web-based
63
investigatory searches to supplement the search for
64
interested parties and addresses. The reasonable cost of
65
locating interested parties and a d dresses for notice may be
66
recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section
67
141.580.
68
6. No later than thirty days prior to the sheriff's
69
sale, t h e collector shall send notice of the sale to all
70
interested parties at the address most likely to apprise
71
interested parties of the sale. The notice shall provide
72
the date, time, and place of th e sale and shall also state
73
that the parcel may be redeemed prior to the sale as
74
specified in sections 141.420 and 141.530. The notice
75
required by this subsection shall be maile d first class,
76
postage prepaid. The cost of notice under this subsection
77
may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section
78
141.580.
79
7. No later than twenty days prior to the sheriff's
80
sale, t h e sheriff shall enter upon the parcel subject to
81
foreclosure of these tax liens and post a written
82
informational notice in a conspicuous location, attached to
83
a structure, and intended to be visible by the nearest
84
public right-of-way. This notice shall describe the parcel
85
and advise that it i s the subject of delinquent land tax

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 49
86
collection proceedings brought under sections 141.210 to
87
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015 and that it may be
88
sold for the payment of delinquent taxes at a sale to be
89
held at a certain time, date, and place and shall also
90
contain the tax identification number and the phone number
91
and address of the collector as well as a prohibition
92
against removal unless the parcel has been redeemed. The
93
notice shall be not less than eight inches by ten inc hes and
94
shall be laminated or otherwise sufficiently weatherproof to
95
withstand normal exposure to rain, snow, and other
96
conditions. The sheriff shall document, by time-stamped
97
photograph, compliance with this section, make such
98
documentation generally available upon request, and provide
99
verification by affidavit of compliance with this section.
100
The cost of notice under this subsection may be recovered
101
from the proceeds of the sale under section 141.580.
102
8. In addition to the other notice requirements of
103
this se c tion, no later than twenty days prior to the
104
sheriff's sale, the sheriff shall attempt in-person notice
105
that shall describe the parcel and advise that it is the
106
subject of delinquent land tax collection proceedings
107
brought under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections
108
141.980 to 141.1015; that shall state that it may be sold
109
for the payment of delinquent taxes at a sale to be held at
110
a certain time, date, and place; and that shall also contain
111
the tax identification number and the phone number and
112
address of the collector. In-person notice may be provided
113
to any person found at th e parcel. The sheriff shall note
114
the date and time of attempted not i ce and the name,
115
description, or other identifying information regarding the
116
person to whom notice was attempted. The sheriff shall
117
document compliance with this sectio n , make such

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 50
118
documentation generally available upon request, and provide
119
verification by affidavit of compliance with this section.
120
The cost of notice under this subsection may be recovered
121
from the proceeds of the sale under section 141.580.
1
141.535. 1. If a parcel is the subject of an action
2
filed under s e cti o ns 447.620 to 447.640, the court shall
3
stay the sale of any tax parcel to be sold under execution
4
of a tax foreclosure judgment obtained under this chapter,
5
provided that the party which has brought such an action has
6
paid into the circuit court the principal amount of all
7
[land] delinquent taxes then due and owing under the tax
8
foreclosure judgment, exclusive of penalties, interest,
9
attorney fees, and court costs, prior to the date of any
10
proposed sale under execution. The party bringing such
11
action shall provide written n o tice of the filing of the
12
action to the court administrator and file with the circuit
13
court in which the action is pending a certificate that such
14
notice has been provided to the court administrator. If the
15
party that brought the action under sections 447.620 to
16
447.640 dismisses its action prior to gaining temporary
17
possession of the property, it shall recover any amounts
18
paid into the circuit court under this subsection.
19
2. In any order granting a sheriff's deed under
20
section 447.625 or a judicial deed under section 447.640,
21
the court shall also order the permanent extinguishment of
22
liability against the grantee and the grantee's successors
23
in interest for penalties, interest, attorney fees, and
24
court costs arising from actions to collect delinquent land
25
taxes due on the subject property. The funds paid into the
26
court for land taxes under subsecti on 1 of this section
27
shall then be paid to the county collector.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 51
28
3. If an owner of such a property moves the court for
29
restora t ion of possession of the subject property under
30
section 447.638, the owner shall pay into the circuit court
31
all land tax amounts currently due and owing on the
32
property, including all statutory penalties, interest,
33
attorney fees, and court costs retroactive to the date of
34
accrual, and in the event that an owner of the tax parcel
35
regains possession under section 447.638, funds deposited by
36
the owner under this subsection shall be paid to the county
37
collector, and funds paid into the court by a party under
38
subsection 1 of this section shall be paid out in full to
39
the payer.
1
141.540. 1. In any county at a certain front door of
2
whose courtho u se s ales of real estate are customarily made
3
by the sheriff under execution, the sheriff shall advertise
4
for sale and sell the respective parcels of real estate
5
ordered sold by the sheriff pursuant to any judgment of
6
foreclosure by any court pursuant to sections 141.210 to
7
141.810 and 141.980 to 141.1015 at any of such courthouses[,
8
but]. The sale of such parcels of real estate shall be held
9
at th e same front door as sales of real estate are
10
customarily made by the sheriff under execution.
11
2. Such advertisements may include more than one
12
parcel o f real estate, and shall be in substantially the
13
following form:
14
NOTICE OF SHERIFF'S
15
SALE UNDER JUDGMENT OF
16
FORECLOSURE OF LIENS FOR
17
DELINQUENT LAND TAXES

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 52
18
No. ______
19
In the Circuit Court of ______ County,
20
Missouri.
21
In the Matter of Foreclosure of Liens for
22
Delinquent Land Taxes
23
Collector of Revenue of ______ County,
24
Missouri, Plaintiff,
25
vs.
26
Parcels of Land encumbered with Delinquent Tax
27
Liens, Defendants.
28
WHEREAS, judgment has been rendered against
29
parcels of real estate for taxes, interest,
30
penalties, attorney's fees and costs with the
31
serial numbers of each parcel of real estate,
32
the description thereof, the name of the person
33
appearing in the petition in the suit, and the
34
total amount of the judgment against each such
35
parcel for taxes, interest, penalties,
36
attorney's fees and costs, all as set out in
37
said judgment and described in each case,
38
respectively, as follows: (Here set out the
39
respective serial numbers, descriptions, names
40
and total amounts of each judgment, next above
41
referred to.) and,
42
WHEREAS, such judgment orders such real estate
43
sold by the undersigned sheriff, to satisfy the
44
total amount of such judgment, including
45
interest, penalties, attorney's fees and
46
costs,
47
NOW, THEREFORE,
48
Public Notice is hereby given that I ______,
49
Sheriff of ______ County, Missouri, will sell
50
such real estate, parcel by parcel, at public

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 53
51
auction, to the highest bidder, for cash,
52
between the hours of nine o'clock A.M. and five
53
o'clock P.M., at the ______ front door of the
54
______ County Courthouse in ______, Missouri,
55
on ______, the ______ day of ______, 20______,
56
and continuing from day to day thereafter, to
57
satisfy the judgment as to each respective
58
parcel of real estate sold. If no acceptable
59
bids are received as to any parcel of real
60
estate, said parcel shall be sold to the Land
61
Trust of ______ (insert name of County),
61
Missouri or Land Bank of the City of ______
62
(insert name of municipality), Missouri.
63
Any bid received shall be subject to
64
confirmation by the court.
65
__________________
66
Sheriff of _____ County,
67
Missouri
68
__________________
69
Delinquent Land Tax
70
Attorney
71
Address: ______
72
First Publication ______, 20______
73
3. Such advertisement shall be published four times,
74
once a w eek, upon the same day of each week during
75
successive weeks prior to the date of such sale, in a daily
76
newspaper of general circulation regularly published in the
77
county, qualified according to law for the publication of
78
public notices and advertisements.
1
141.550. 1. The sale shall be conducted, the
2
sheriff's ret u rn t hereof made, and the sheriff's deed

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 54
3
pursuant to the sale executed, all as provided in the case
4
of sales of real estate taken under execution, except as
5
otherwise provided in sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
6
sections 141.980 to 141.1015, and provided that such sale
7
need not occur during the term of court or while the court
8
is in session.
9
2. The following provisions shall apply to any sale
10
pursuan t to this section:
11
(1) The sale shall be held on the day for which it is
12
advertis e d, between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. and five
13
o'clock p.m. and continued day to day thereafter to satisfy
14
the judgment as to each respective parcel of real estate
15
sold. For partial opt-in counties, the sale shall be held
16
on th e fourth Monday in August of each year between the
17
hours of nine o'clock a.m. and five o'clock p.m. and
18
continued day to day thereafter to satisfy the judgment as
19
to each respective parcel of real estate sold;
20
(2) The sale shall be conducted publicly, by auction,
21
for read y money. The parcel shall be sold to the highest
22
bidder, provided that the highest bid is equal to or greater
23
than the full amount of all tax bills due and owing on the
24
parcel, which may differ from the judgment amount; plus
25
interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs; and a
26
nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar bidder fee. Such bidder
27
fee shall be paid to the land trust or land bank agency for
28
the municipality or county in which the parcel is situated.
29
The bid amount shall not include any amounts for debts owed
30
to any sewer district then due thereon;
31
(3) No person shall be eligible to bid at the time of
32
the sale unless such person has, no later than ten days
33
before the sale date, demonstrated to the satisfaction of
34
the official charged by law with conducting the sale that he

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 55
35
or she is not the owner of any parcel of real estate in the
36
county which is affected by a tax bill which has been
37
delinquent for more than six months. A prospective bidder
38
may make such a demonstration by pre s enting statements from
39
the appropriate collection officials of the county. The
40
official charged with conducting the sale may requi r e
41
prospective bidders to submit an affidavit attesting to the
42
requirements of this subdivision and is expressly authorized
43
to permanently preclude any prospective bidder from
44
participating in the sale for failure to comply with the
45
provisions of this subdivision; and
46
(4) No foreign or domestic corporation or limited
47
liabilit y company that has failed to appoint or maintain a
48
registered agent under chapter 347 or 351 shall be eligible
49
to bid at the time of the sale. No foreign corporate entity
50
shall be eligible to bid at the time of the sale unless it
51
has a certificate of authority to transact business in
52
Missouri under section 351.572. The official charged with
53
conducting the sale may require prospective bidders to
54
submit an affidavit attesting to the requirements of this
55
subdivision and is expressly authorized to permanently
56
preclude any prospective bidder from participating in the
57
sale for failure to comply with the provisions of this
58
subdivision.
59
3. The following provisions shall apply to any sale
60
under t h is section of property located within any
61
municipality contained wholly or partially within a county
62
with a population of over six hundred thousand inhabitants
63
and fewer than nine hundred thousand inhabitants:
64
(1) No person shall be eligible to bid at the time of
65
the sale unless such person has, no later than ten days
66
before the sale date, demonstrated to the satisfaction of

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 56
67
the official charged by law with conducting the sale that
68
the person is not the owner of any parcel of real property
69
with two or more violations of the municipality's building
70
or housing codes. A prospective bidder may make such a
71
demonstration by p resenting statements from the appropriate
72
code enforcement officials of the municipality; and
73
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)
74
of this s ubsection, any taxing authority or land bank agency
75
shall be eligible to bid at the sale without making the
76
demonstration described in subdivision (1) of this
77
subsection.
78
4. Such sale shall convey the whole interest of every
79
person h aving or claiming any right, title or interest in or
80
lien upon such real estate, whether such person has answered
81
or not, subject to rights-of-way thereon of public utilities
82
upon which tax has been otherwise paid, and subject to the
83
lien thereon, if any, of the United States of America.
84
5. The collector shall advance the sums necessary to
85
pay for the publication of all advertisements required by
86
sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015
87
and shall be allowed credit therefor in the collector's
88
accounts with the county. The collector shall give credit
89
in such accounts for all s uch advances recovered by the
90
collector. Such expenses of publication shall be
91
apportione d pro rata among and taxed as costs against the
92
respective parcels of real estate described in the judgment;
93
provided, however, that none of the costs herein enumerated,
94
including the costs of publication, shall constitute any
95
lien upon the real estate after such sale.
1
141.560. 1. If, when the sheriff offers the
2
respective pa r cel s of real estate for sale, there [be] are
3
no bidders for any parcel, or there [be] is insufficient

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 57
4
time or opportunity to sell all of the parcels of real
5
estate so advertised, the sheriff shall adjourn such sale
6
from day to day at the same place and commencing at the same
7
hour as when first offered and shall announce that such real
8
estate will be offered or reoffered for sale at such time
9
and place.
10
2. With respect to any parcel of real estate not
11
located wholly within a county or municipality that has
12
established a land bank agency under section 140.981 or
13
141.980, in the event no bid equal to the full amount of all
14
tax bills due and owing on the parcel, which may differ from
15
the judgment amount; plus interest; penalties; attorney's
16
fees and costs; and a nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar
17
bidder fee that shall be received at such sale after any
18
parcel of real estate has been offered for sale on three
19
different days, which need not be successive, the land trust
20
shall be deemed to have bid the full amount of all tax bills
21
included in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's
22
fees and costs then due, and if no other bid be then
23
received by the sheriff in excess of the bid of the land
24
trust, and the sheriff shall so announce at the sale, then
25
the bid of the land trust shall be announced as accepted.
26
The sheriff shall report any such bid or bids so made by t he
27
land trust in the same way as the sheriff's report of other
28
bids is made. Upon confirmation by the court of such bid at
29
such sale by s uch land trust, the collector shall mark the
30
tax bills so bid by the land trust as "cancelled by sale to
31
the land trust" and shall take credit for the full amount of
32
such tax bills, including principal amount, interest,
33
penalties, attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's
34
books and in the collector's statements with any other
35
taxing authorities.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 58
36
3. With respect to any parcel of real estate located
37
wholly w ithin a county or municipality that has established
38
a land bank agency under section 140.981 or 141.980, in the
39
event no bid equal to the full amount of all tax bills due
40
and owing on the parcel, which may differ from the judgment
41
amount; plus interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs;
42
and a nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar bidder fee that
43
shall be received at such sale after such parcel of real
44
estate has been offered for sale on three different days,
45
which need not be successive, the land bank agency
46
established under section 140.981 or 141.980 shall be deemed
47
to have bid the full amount of all tax bills included in the
48
judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs
49
then due, and the sheriff shall so announce at the sale,
50
then the bid of the land bank agency shall be announced as
51
accepted. The sheriff shall report any such bid or bids so
52
made by s u ch land bank agency in the same way as the
53
sheriff's report of other bids is made. Upon confirmation
54
by the court of such bid at such sale by such land bank
55
agency, the collector shall mark the tax bills so bid by
56
such land bank agency as "cancelled by sale to the land
57
bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such tax
58
bills, including principal amount, interest, penalties,
59
attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's books and in
60
the collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
1
141.570. The title to any real estate which shall vest
2
in any purcha s er[,] upon confirmation of such sale by the
3
court, or in any land bank agency or land trust, shall be an
4
absolute estate in fee simple, subject to rights-of-way
5
thereon of public utilities on which tax has been otherwise
6
paid, and subject to any lien thereon of the United States
7
of America, if any, and all persons and interested parties,

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 59
8
including the state of Missouri, any taxing authority or tax
9
district, as defined herein, judgment creditors,
10
lienholders, infants, incapacitated and disabled persons as
11
defined in chapter 475, and nonresidents who may have had
12
any right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption
13
in or to, or lien upon, such lands, shall be barred and
14
forever foreclosed of all such right, title, interest,
15
claim, lien or equity of redemption, and the court shall
16
order immediate possession of such real estate be given to
17
such purchaser; provided, however, that such title shall
18
also be subject to the liens of any tax bills which may have
19
attached after the sheriff's sale, but if such parcel of
20
real estate is deemed sold to the land trust pursuant to
21
subsection 2 of section 141.560, or deemed sold to a land
22
bank agency pursuant to subsection 3 of section 141.560, or
23
sold to a land bank agency pursuant to subdivision (2) of
24
subsection 2 of section 141.550, the title thereto shall be
25
free of any such liens to the extent of the interest of any
26
taxing authority in such real estate; provided further, that
27
the lien of special tax bills shall attach to the proceeds
28
of the sheri ff's sale, if any, or shall otherwise be forever
29
barred and foreclosed.
1
141.580. 1. Within six months after the sheriff sells
2
any parcel of rea l estate, the court shall, upon its own
3
motion or upon motion of any interested party, set the cause
4
[down] for hearing to confirm or set aside the foreclosure
5
sale thereof, even though such parcels are not all of the
6
parcels of real estate described in the notice of sheriff's
7
foreclosure sale. Notice of the hearing, or of the court
8
moving to confirm the foreclosure sale, shall be sent by any
9
interested party to each person who was sent notice of the
10
sale and to any interested parties as required by prevailing

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 60
11
notions of due process. At the time of such hearing, the
12
sheriff shall make repo r t of the sale, and the court shall
13
hear evidence of the value of the property offered on behalf
14
of any interested party to the suit, and shall forthwith
15
determine whether an adequate consideration has been paid
16
for each such parcel. The court's judgment shall include a
17
specific finding that adequate notice was provided to all
18
interested parties under prevailing notions of due process
19
and sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to
20
141.1015, reciting the notice efforts of the collector,
21
sheriff, and tax sale purchaser. Nothing in this section
22
shall be interpreted to preclude a successful tax sale
23
purchaser from asserting a claim to quiet title to the bid-
24
upon parcel under section 527.150.
25
2. For this purpose the court shall have power to
26
summon a ny city or county official or any private person to
27
testify as to the reasonable value of the property, and if
28
the court finds that adequate consideration has been paid,
29
the court shall confirm the sale and order the sheriff to
30
issue a deed to the purchaser. If the court finds that the
31
consideration paid is inadequa t e, the court shall confirm
32
the sale if the purchaser increases the purchaser's bid to
33
such amount as the court deems to be adequate and makes such
34
additional payment, or if all tax bills included in the
35
judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs
36
then due thereon are not paid in full by one or more
37
interested parties to the suit. If the court finds that the
38
consideration is inadequate, bu t the purchaser declines to
39
increase the purchaser's bid to such amount as the court
40
deems adequate and make such additional payment, then the
41
sale shall be disapproved if all tax bills included in the
42
judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 61
43
then due thereon are paid in full by one or more interested
44
parties to the suit, the lien of the judgment continued, and
45
such parcel of real estate shall be again advertised and
46
offered for sale by the sheriff to the highest bidder at
47
public auction for cash at any subsequent sheriff's
48
foreclosure sale. Unless the court requires evidence of the
49
value of the prope rty conveyed to land trust or a land bank
50
agency, none shall be required, and the amount bid by the
51
land trust or such land bank agency shall be deemed adequate
52
consideration.
53
3. If the sale is confirmed, the court shall order the
54
proceed s [of] from the sale applied in the following order:
55
(1) To the payment of the costs of the publication of
56
the noti c e of foreclosure and of the sheriff's foreclosure
57
sale;
58
(2) To the payment of all of the collector's and
59
sheriff' s costs including appraiser's fee and attorney's
60
fees;
61
(3) To the payment of all tax bills adjudged to be due
62
in the o r der of their priority, including principal,
63
interest and penalties thereon, except in the event of a
64
sale to any land bank agency, for which this subdivision
65
shall not apply.
66
If, after such payment, there is any sum remaining of the
67
proceeds of the sheriff's foreclosure sale, the court shall
68
thereupon try and determine the other issues in the suit in
69
accordance with section 141.480. If any answering parties
70
have specially appealed as provi d ed in section 141.570, the
71
court shall retain the custody of such funds pending
72
disposition of such appeal, and upon disposition of such
73
appeal shall make such distribution. If there are not

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 62
74
sufficient proceeds of the sale to pay all claims in any
75
class described, the court shall order the same to be paid
76
pro rata in accordance with the priorities.
77
4. If there are any funds remaining of the proceeds
78
after t h e sheriff's sale and after the distribution of such
79
funds as herein set out and no person entitled to any such
80
funds, whether or not a party to the suit, shall, within two
81
years after such sale, appear and claim the funds, the funds
82
shall be distributed to the appropriate taxing authorities,
83
except in partial opt-in counties, where the funds shall be
84
distributed to the school fund for the county.
85
5. Any county operating under the provisions of
86
section s 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015
87
may elect to allocate a portion of its share of the proceeds
88
toward a fund for the purpose of defending against claims
89
challenging the sufficiency of notice provisions under this
90
section.
91
6. Any interested party, other than the sheriff's sale
92
purchas e r, who moves the court to set aside a sheriff's sale
93
after the issuance of a sheriff's deed made under the
94
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections
95
141.980 to 141.1015 shall be required to pay into the court
96
the redemption amount otherwise necessary under sections
97
141.420 and 141.530 prior to the court hearing any such
98
motion to set aside.
1
141.610. Each court administrator's or sheriff's deed
2
given pursuan t to the provisions of the land tax collection
3
law shall be prima facie evidence that the suit and all
4
proceedings therein and all proceedings prior thereto [from
5
and], including assessment of the lands affected thereby and
6
all notices required by law were regular and in accordance
7
with all provisions of the law relating thereto. The court

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 63
8
administrator or sheriff shall record its deed and shall
9
collect said recording fee at the time of sale.
1
141.620. 1. In addition to all amounts due on any tax
2
bill, includi n g p r incipal, interest, penalties, attorney's
3
fees, and costs, as now fixed by law, there shall be imposed
4
and charged as a part of the costs on each such tax bill a
5
suit penalty of five percent of the principal amount of the
6
tax bill to be due to the collector upon the filing of the
7
petition with the circuit clerk.
8
2. The collector shall set up a separate fund in the
9
collect o r's accounts to which the collector shall credit
10
such five percent suit penalties when paid, together with
11
all other penalties and costs recovered under this action,
12
and shall retain such portion thereof as may be needed for
13
the purpose of paying the expenses and costs required to be
14
advanced under sections 141.210 to 141.810, including
15
compensation to the delinquent land tax attorney, the
16
attorney's assistants, and stenographic and clerical help,
17
and funds for the costs of publication, notices, for court
18
costs, sheriff's expenses and other costs hereunder, and
19
shall transfer the remainder of such funds annually, on
20
January first of each year, to the land trust for the use
21
and expenses of the land trust. Where n o land trust exists,
22
the collector shall retain the r emainder of such funds.
1
141.680. 1. Except for partial opt-in counties, the
2
remedies and p roc e dures set forth in sections 141.210 to
3
141.810 shall be the exclusive remedies and procedures
4
available for the collection of delinquent and back land
5
taxes in a county [electing] that elects to come under or
6
[which] that has come under their authority. Sections
7
141.210 to 141.810 shall not be affected nor infringed upon
8
by any other laws or parts of law in conflict herewith.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 64
9
2. Any taxing authority or owner of any tax bill is
10
hereby p rohibited from advertising for sale or selling any
11
parcel of real estate for the collection of delinquent land
12
taxes due thereon, except after judgment of a court having
13
jurisdiction ordering such advertising or sale, when such
14
parcel is at such time included in any petition filed
15
pursuant to the provisions of this law.
16
3. At the option of the taxing authority or tax bill
17
owner, a ll claims for land taxes against any parcel of real
18
estate, which has been included in any petition filed under
19
this law, where such taxes have become due and payable after
20
any tax list or petition thereon has been filed, may be
21
asserted by amended petition or by answer filed before
22
judgment, and, if allowed by the court, shall be included in
23
the judgment against such parcel of real estate.
1
141.700. In all counties electing to operate under
2
sections 141. 2 10 to 141.810 prior to January 1, 2025, there
3
is hereby created a commission for the management, sale, and
4
other disposition of tax delinquent lands, which commission
5
shall be known as "The Land Trust of ______ County,
6
Missouri", and the members thereof shall be known as land
7
trustees. Such land trust shall have and exercise all the
8
powers th a t are conferred by sections 141.210 to 141.810
9
necessary and incidental to the effective management, sale
10
or other disposition of real estate acquired under and by
11
virtue of the foreclosure of the lien for delinquent real
12
estate taxes, as provided in said sections, and in the
13
exercise of such powers, the land trust shall be deemed to
14
be a public corporation acting in a governmental capacity.
15
Where a county has elected to establish a land bank agency
16
under subsection 1 of section 140.981, no such land trust
17
shall be created under sections 141.700 to 141.810.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 65
1
141.819. 1. In all partial opt-in counties, prior to
2
a confirmatio n by a court of a deemed bid under subsection 2
3
of section 141.560, a land trust shall be created for the
4
management, sale, and other disposition of tax delinquent
5
lands, which shall be known as "The Land Trust of ______
6
County, Missouri", and the board of which shall be known as
7
land trustees. The county commission of such county shall
8
appoint by res o lution or order one or three land trustees.
9
The first appointed land trustee shall serve for a term of
10
two years and the remaining land trustees shall serve for
11
terms of three years respectively, as applicable.
12
Thereafter, land trustees shall be appointed by th e county
13
commission for a term of office of two years, except that
14
all vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term.
15
2. If a county elected to establish a land bank agency
16
under s u bsection 1 of section 140.981, no such land trust
17
shall be created under sections 141.700 to 141.819.
18
3. Such land trust, by majority vote of the land
19
trustee s , shall have the power and duty to sell, exchange,
20
or otherwise dispose of real estate, provided, however, that
21
any such sale, exchange, or disposal shall be for
22
consideration equal to or in excess of two-thirds of the
23
appraised value of such real estate so sold or conveyed, and
24
if such consideration is less than two-thirds of the
25
appraised value of such real estate, the land trust shall
26
first procure a majority vote of the county commission.
27
4. (1) The land trust shall set up accounts relating
28
to the o pera t ion and management of the land trust.
29
(2) When any parcel of real estate is sold or
30
otherwis e disposed of by the land trust, the proceeds
31
therefrom shall be applied and distributed in the following
32
order:

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 66
33
(a) To the payment of the expenses of sale;
34
(b) To the costs of the care, improvement, operation,
35
acquisit i on, demolition, management, and administration of
36
parcels of real estate owned by the land trust; and
37
(c) To the county's general fund.
38
5. N o land trustee shall receive any compensation,
39
emolume n t, or other profit directly or indirectly from the
40
rental, management, acquisition, sale, demolition, repair,
41
rehabilitation, use, operation, ownership, or disposition of
42
any lands held by such land trust.
1
141.980. 1. (1) Sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall
2
be known [and may be c i ted] as the "Chapter 141 Municipal
3
Land Bank Act".
4
(2) Any municipality located wholly or partially
5
within a county electing to operate wholly under the
6
provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 may establish a
7
land bank agency for the management, sale, transfer, and
8
other disposition of interests in real estate owned by such
9
land bank agency. Any such land bank agency created shall
10
be created to fos t er the public purpose of returning land,
11
including land that is in a nonrevenue-generating, nontax-
12
producing status to use in private ownership or for public
13
use. Such land bank agency shall be established by
14
ordin ance or resolution as applicable. Such land bank
15
agency shall not own any interest in r e al estate that is
16
located wholly or partially outside such establishing
17
municipality. No municipality in a partial opt-in county is
18
eligible to e s tablish a land bank agency under this section.
19
2. The beneficiaries of the land bank agency shall be
20
the tax i ng authorities that held or owned tax bills against
21
the respective parcels of real estate acquired by such land
22
bank agency pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 67
23
section 141.560, by deed from a land trust under subsection
24
1 of section 141.984, or pursuant to a sale under
25
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 141.550 included
26
in the judgment of the court, and the beneficiaries'
27
respective interests in each parcel of real estate shall be
28
to the extent and in the proportion and according to the
29
priorities determined by the court on the basis that the
30
principal amount of the beneficiaries' respective tax bills
31
bore to the total principal amount of all of the tax bills
32
described in the judgment.
33
3. Each land bank agency created pursuant to this
34
chapter shall be a public body corporate and politic, and
35
shall have permanent and perpetual duration until terminated
36
and dissolved in accordance with the provisions of section
37
141.1012.
1
141.984. 1. Within one year of the effective date of
2
the ordinance or r esolution passed establishing a land bank
3
agency under this chapter, title to any real property held
4
by a land trust created pursuant to section 141.700 that is
5
located wholly within the municipality that created the land
6
bank agency shall be transferred by deed to such land bank
7
agency.
8
2. The income of a land bank agency shall be exempt
9
from al l taxation by the state and by any of its political
10
subdivisions. Upon acquiring title to any real estate, a
11
land bank agen cy shall immediately notify the county
12
assessor and the collector of such ownership, and such real
13
estate shall be exempt from all taxation during the land
14
bank agency's ownership thereof, in the same manner and to
15
the same extent as any other publicly owned real estate, and
16
upon the sale or other disposition of any real estate held
17
by it, such land bank agency shall immediately notify the

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 68
18
county assessor and the collector of such change of
19
ownership; provided however, that such tax exemption for
20
improved and occupied real property held by such land bank
21
agency as lessor pursuant to a ground lease shall terminate
22
upon the first such occupancy, and such land bank agency
23
shall immediately notify the county assessor and the
24
collector of such occupancy.
25
3. Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection 1
26
of sect i on 141.980, a land bank agency may acquire real
27
property or interests in property by gift, devise, transfer,
28
exchange, foreclosure, purchase, or [pursuant to sections
29
141.560 to 141.580 or section 141.819. A land bank agency
30
may only purchase real property for th e purpose of adding to
31
a parcel already owned by the land bank agency] otherwise on
32
terms and conditions and in a manner the land bank agency
33
considers proper.
34
4. Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection 1
35
of sect i on 141.980, a land bank agency may acquire property
36
by purchase contracts, installment sales contracts, and land
37
contacts, and may accept transfers from political
38
subdivisions upon such terms and conditions as agreed to by
39
the land bank agency and the political subdivision. Subject
40
to the limitation set forth in subsection 1 of sect i on
41
141.980, a land bank agency may bid on any parcel of real
42
estate offered for sale at a sheriff's foreclosure sale held
43
in accordance with section 141.550. Notwithstanding any
44
other law to the contrary, but subj e ct to the limitation set
45
forth in subsection 1 of section 141.980, any political
46
subdivision may transfer to the land bank agency real
47
property and interests in real property of the political
48
subdivision on such terms and conditions and according to
49
such procedures as determined by the political subdivision.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 69
50
5. A land bank agency shall maintain all of its real
51
propert y in accordance with the laws and ordinances of the
52
jurisdictions in which the real property is located.
53
6. Upon confirmation under section 141.580 of a
54
sheriff ' s foreclosure sale of a parcel of real estate to a
55
land bank agency under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
56
section 141.550, said land bank agency shall pay the amount
57
of the land bank agency's bid that exceeds the amount of all
58
tax bills included in the judgment, interest, penalties,
59
attorney's fees and costs then due thereon. Such excess
60
shall be applied and distributed in accorda n ce with
61
subsections 3 and 4 of section 141.580, exclusive of
62
subdivision (3) of subsection 3 thereof. Upon such
63
confirmation by the court, the collector shall mark the tax
64
bills included in the judgment as "cancelled by sale to the
65
land bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such
66
tax bills, including principal amount, interest, penalties,
67
attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's books and in
68
the collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
1
141.1009. 1. A land bank agency shall be authorized
2
to file an act i on t o quiet title pursuant to section 527.150
3
as to any real property in which the land bank agency has an
4
interest. For purposes of any and all such actions, the
5
land bank agency shall be deemed to be the holder of
6
sufficient legal and equitable interests, and possessory
7
rights, so as to qualify the land bank agency as adequate
8
petitioner in such action.
9
2. Prior to the filing of an action to quiet title the
10
land ba n k agency shall conduct an examination of title to
11
determine the identity of any and all persons and entities
12
possessing a claim or interest in or to the real property.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 70
13
Service of the petition to quiet title shall be provided to
14
all such interested parties by the following methods:
15
(1) Registered or certified mail to such identity and
16
address a s reasonably ascertainable by an inspection of
17
public records;
18
(2) In the case of occupied real property by first
19
class ma i l, addressed to "Occupant";
20
(3) By posting a copy of the notice on the real
21
property ;
22
(4) By publication in a newspaper of general
23
circulat i on in the municipality in which the property is
24
located; and
25
(5) Such other methods as the court may order or as
26
may be r e quired by prevailing notions of due process.
27
3. As part of the petition to quiet title the land
28
bank ag e ncy shall file an affidavit identifying all parties
29
potentially having an interest in the real property, and the
30
form of notice provided.
31
4. The court shall schedule a hearing on the petition
32
within n inety days following filing of the petition, and as
33
to all matters upon which an answer was not filed by an
34
interested party the court shall issue its final judgment
35
within one hundred twenty days of the filing of the petition.
36
5. A land bank agency shall be authorized to join in a
37
single p etition to quiet title one or more parcels of real
38
property.
1
141.1020. Notwithstanding any provision of sections
2
141.980 to 141 . 1020 to the contrary, a land bank agency may
3
rent or lease property held by the land bank agency for
4
community, noncommercial, and agricultural uses.
1
249.255. 1. Should a public sewer district created
2
and organized pur s uant to constitutional or statutory

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 71
3
authority place a lien upon a customer's property for unpaid
4
sewer charges, the lien, once properly recorded, shall have
5
priority above all liens except for those taxes levied for
6
state and county purposes.
7
2. Should the sewer charges of a public sewer district
8
created and organized pursuant to constitutional or
9
statutory authority remain unpaid for a period in excess of
10
three months, the district, after notice to the customer by
11
certified mail, shall have the authority at its discretion,
12
to disconnect the customer's sewer line from the district's
13
line or request any private water company, public water
14
supply district, or any municipality supplying water to the
15
premises to discontinue service to the customer until such
16
time as the sewer charges and all related costs of this
17
section are paid.
1
407.3600. 1. For purposes of this section, the
2
following terms me a n:
3
(1) "Residential real property", real property that is
4
improved by a building or other structure that has one to
5
four dwelling units;
6
(2) (a) "Wholesaler", a person or entity that for a
7
fee, com m issi o n, or other valuable consideration, or with
8
the intention, expectation, or upon the promise of receiving
9
or collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable
10
consideration, enters into a purchase contract for
11
residential real property either:
12
a. As the grantee, and assigns or novates the contract
13
to anot h er person or entity; or
14
b. As the grantor, and, without holding legal title to
15
the rea l property, assigns or novates the contract to
16
another person or entity.
17
(b) "Wholesaler" shall not include:

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 72
18
a. An individual who assigns or novates the contract
19
to anot h er individual who is a relative within the third
20
degree of consanguinity or affinity; or
21
b. A person or entity that assigns or novates the
22
contrac t to a parent, affiliate, subsidiary, or affiliated
23
group under common control with the person or entity.
24
2. Not less than fourteen calendar days before
25
enterin g into a contract that transfers an interest in
26
residential real property, a wholesaler acting as a grantee
27
or a wholesaler's representative, if applicable, shall
28
provide to the record owner a written disclosure statement,
29
separate from the purchase contract or agreement, printed in
30
boldface type font size not less than twelve points, that
31
contains the following disclosure:
32
Missouri law requires a wholesaler acting as
33
a grantee, before entering into a contract or
34
agreement that conveys an interest in
35
residential real property, to provide certain
36
information to the record owner in a
37
conspicuous manner printed in boldface type
38
font size not less than twelve points.
39
Failure by a wholesaler to present or
40
complete this form shall be considered an
41
unlawful and unfair practice under the
42
Missouri Merchandising Practices Act. Any
43
person who enters into an agreement that
44
conveys an interest in residential real
45
property to a wholesaler acting as a grantee
46
without receiving this disclosure has a cause
47
of action against the wholesaler. A
48
wholesaler acting as a grantee is prohibited
49
from entering into a binding contract to
50
acquire an interest in residential real
51
property unless this statement is signed and
52
dated by the record owner of the property.

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 73
53
The owner acknowledges that the person
54
presenting this document is a wholesaler, as
55
defined in section 407.3600 of the Revised
56
Statutes of Missouri, and that the owner is
57
advised to seek legal advice before entering
58
into any agreement or contract with the
59
wholesaler. A wholesaler is acting on the
60
wholesaler's own behalf and does not
61
represent the owner in this transaction. A
62
wholesaler enters assignable contracts with
63
owners and seeks to sell or assign the
64
wholesaler's interest for a profit. The
65
wholesaler may assign the wholesaler's
66
interest in the purchase contract to a third
67
party without the owner's consent before
68
closing. The wholesaler may charge a fee to
69
the third-party buyer separately for profit.
70
The agreed purchase price between the owner
71
and wholesaler may be below market value and
72
is conveyed voluntarily.
73
The owner acknowledges disclosure of the
74
information provided in this form by signing
75
and dating below:
76
_________ (Property owner signature) ___
77
(date)
78
_________ (Wholesaler signature) ___ (date).
79
3. A wholesaler acting as the grantee shall not enter
80
into a b inding contract that transfers an interest in
81
residential real property until both the wholesaler and the
82
record owner of the property sign and date the disclosure
83
statement required under subsection 2 of this section.
84
4. If a wholesaler acting as the grantee fails to make
85
the dis c losures pursuant to subsection 2 of this section
86
before entering into a binding contract that transfers an

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 74
87
interest in residential real property, the record owner of
88
the residential real property may cancel the contract at any
89
time prior to the close of escrow without penalty and the
90
escrow or closing agent shall disburse any earnest money
91
paid by the wholesaler to the record owner within thirty
92
days after such cancellation.
93
5. Provisions of this section shall not be modified or
94
waived b y any oral or written agreement. Any portion of an
95
agreement that is executed, modified, or extended after the
96
effective date of this section that modifies or waives any
97
provision of this section shall be null and void.
98
6. Any violation of this section shall be considered
99
an unla w ful practice under the Missouri merchandising
100
practices act under this chapter. A party that enters into
101
an agreement without receiving th e disclosures required
102
under subsection 2 of this section may bring a private
103
action against a wholesaler.
104
7. The attorney general shall have the authority to
105
enforce the provisions of this section. If the attorney
106
general finds that a violation occurred , the attorney
107
general may commence a civil action in a court of competent
108
jurisdiction. If the court finds that a violation occurred,
109
the court may grant damages, injunctive relief, attorney
110
fees, and any such other relief the court finds appropriate.
1
442.920. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2
cited as the " Mis s ouri Residential Sale Leaseback Protection
3
Act".
4
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
5
mean:
6
(1) "Buyer", any person or entity that acquires an
7
ownershi p interest in residential real estate in a sale
8
leaseback transaction;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 75
9
(2) "Residential real estate", real property that is
10
improved by a building or other structure that has one to
11
four dwelling units;
12
(3) "Sale leaseback", a transaction or series of
13
transact i ons in which a seller sells residential real estate
14
that is or was the seller's residence to another party and,
15
as a condition of the sale, or as part of the same or a
16
related transaction, enters into a lease or rental agreement
17
to remain in or re-occupy the property;
18
(4) "Seller", any natural person who transfers an
19
ownershi p interest in residential real estate in a sale
20
leaseback transaction.
21
3. (1) In any sale leaseback transaction, the buyer
22
shall p r ovid e the seller with the following disclosure on a
23
single page in a clear and conspicuous manner, printed in
24
boldface type:
25
If you sign a sale leaseback agreement, you
26
are entering into a contract to sell your
27
home. This means you will no longer own your
28
home.
29
You may be subject to eviction if you do not
30
follow the lease terms.
31
You may lose the right to buy back your home.
32
This may affect your credit, taxes, and legal
33
rights.
34
You are encouraged to speak with:
35
(1) An attorney;
36
(2) A real estate agent;
37
(3) A housing counselor;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 76
38
(4) A tax advisor; and
39
(5) A real estate appraiser.
40
No sale leaseback can be closed for at least
41
thirty (30) days after signing an agreement.
42
Do not sign unless you fully understand the
43
terms.
44
(2) The disclosure required by subdivision (1) of this
45
subsecti o n shall be provided to the seller not less than
46
fourteen calendar days prior to execution of any sale
47
leaseback agreement, and the disclosures shall be signed by
48
both the seller and the buyer concurrently with the
49
execution of the sale leaseback agreement.
50
(3) A copy of the signed disclosure required by
51
subdivis i on (1) of this subsection shall be provided to the
52
seller within five days of the execution of the sale
53
leaseback agreement.
54
4. There shall be no delivery, recording, or other
55
transfe r of title from seller to buyer until thirty days
56
after the execution of any sale leaseback agreement.
57
5. (1) Any violation of the provisions of this
58
section shal l be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
59
ten thousand dollars per violation.
60
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to
61
enforce t his section, including actions for injunctive
62
relief, civil penalties, and restitution.
63
(3) Any seller harmed by a violation of this section
64
may brin g a civil action to recover:
65
(a) Actual damages;
66
(b) Statutory damages of ten thousand dollars, which
67
shall be in addition to any actual damages proven;

CCS HCS SS SCS SB 973 77
68
(c) Attorneys' fees and costs; and
69
(d) Equitable or injunctive relief.
70
6. N o provision of this section shall be modified or
71
waived b y any agreement. Any portion of an agreement that
72
is executed, modified, or extended after the effective date
73
of this section that modifies or waives a duty or remedy
74
under this section is void ab initio and unenforceable.
1
Section 1. In the event that any section, provision,
2
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
3
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
4
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
5
it is the intent of the general assembly that the remaining
6
sections of this act remain in force and effect as far as
7
they are capable of being carried into execution as intended
8
by the general assembly. The general assembly hereby
9
declares that it would h a ve passed each section, provision,
10
clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact
11
that any one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases,
12
or words of this act or the application of this act would be
13
declared unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
